Art of ancient Egypt - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Art of PreDynastic Egypt 60003000 BC Toggle Art of PreDynastic Egypt 60003000 BC subsection 
1.1 Merimde culture 50004200 BC 
1.2 Badarian culture 44004000 BC 
1.3 Naqada culture 40003000 BC 

1.3.1 Naqada I 

1.3.2 Naqada II 

1.3.3 Protodynastic Period Naqada III 
2 Art of Dynastic Egypt Toggle Art of Dynastic Egypt subsection 
2.1 Early Dynastic Period 31002685 BC 
2.2 Old Kingdom 26862181 BC 
2.3 Middle Kingdom c. 20551650 BC 
2.4 Second Intermediate Period c. 16501550 BC 
2.5 New Kingdom c. 15501069 BC 

2.5.1 PreAmarna 

2.5.1 .
1 StateSponsored Temples 

2.5.2 Amarna art c. 1350 BC 

2.5.2 .
1 Ramesside Period 
2.6 Third Intermediate Period c.1069664 BC 
2.7 Late Period c. 664332 BC 
2.8 Ptolemaic Period 30530 BC 
2.9 Roman Period 30 BC619 AD 
3 Characteristics Toggle Characteristics subsection 
3.1 Anonymity 
3.2 Symbolism 
4 Materials Toggle Materials subsection 
4.1 Faience 
4.2 Glass 
4.3 Egyptian blue 
4.4 Metals 
4.5 Wood 
4.6 Lapis lazuli 
4.7 Other materials 
5 Sculpture Toggle Sculpture subsection 
5.1 Stele 
5.2 Pyramidia 
6 Painting 
7 Architecture 
8 Jewelry 
9 Amulets Toggle Amulets subsection 
9.1 Scarabshaped amulets 
10 Pottery 
11 Calligraphy 
12 Furniture 
13 Clothing 
14 Cosmetics 
15 Music Toggle Music subsection 
15.1 Sistrum 
16 Funerary art Toggle Funerary art subsection 
16.1 Coffins 
16.2 Canopic jars 
16.3 Masks 
16.4 Ushabti 
17 Art of Mero 
18 Egyptian Revival art 
19 See also 
20 Notes 
21 References 
22 Sources 
23 Further reading 
24 External links Toggle the table of contents Art of ancient Egypt 42 languages     Bosanski Catal etina Deutsch Espaol Esperanto  Franais Galego   Hrvatski Bahasa Indonesia Italiano  Lietuvi Lingua Franca Nova Magyar   Nederlands  Occitan Portugus Romn  Slovenina   srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska  Trke  Ting Vit WestVlams   Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Art produced by the Ancient Egyptian civilization Egyptian art redirects here. For the art of modern Egypt see Contemporary art in Egypt. Art of ancient Egypt The Mask of Tutankhamun c.1327 BC gold glass and semiprecious stones height 54 cm 21 in Egyptian Museum Cairo Menna and Family Hunting in the Marshes Tomb of Menna 
14 th century BCE The Great Pyramid of Giza constructed between c.25802560 BC during the Old Kingdom period History of art Periods and movements Prehistoric Ancient Medieval PreRomanesque Romanesque Gothic Renaissance Mannerism Baroque Rococo Neoclassicism Revivalism Romanticism Realism PreRaphaelites Modern Impressionism Symbolism Decorative PostImpressionism Art Nouveau Fauvism Expressionism Cubism Contemporary Postmodern Conceptualism Pop Minimalism Regions Art of the Middle East Mesopotamian Egyptian Hittite Persian Arabian South Arabian Phoenician Ottoman Art of Central Asia Art of East Asia Chinese Hong Kong Taiwan Japanese Korean Tibetan Art of South Asia Indian Bhutanese Newar Art of Southeast Asia Indonesian Filipino Vietnamese Thai Myanmar Malaysian Cambodian Khmer Lao Singaporean Bruneian Art of Europe Minoan Cycladic Etruscan Dacian Celtic Scythian Greek Hellenistic Iberian Roman Byzantine AngloSaxon Ottonian Viking Rus Art of Africa Igbo Yoruba Benin Kuba Luba Art of the Americas PreColumbian Maya Muisca Inuit Art of Oceania Australian Cook Islands Hawaiian Papuan Religions Buddhist Christian Catholic Protestant Hindu Islamic Jain Manichaean Sikh Taoist Vodou Vodun Techniques Sculpture Painting Pottery Calligraphy Architecture Photography Graphic arts Digital art Types Abstract Art history Art movement List Figurative Funerary Nave Narrative Naturalist v t e Ancient Egyptian art refers to art produced in ancient Egypt between the 
6 th millennium BC and the 
4 th century AD spanning from Prehistoric Egypt until the Christianization of Roman Egypt. It includes paintings sculptures drawings on papyrus faience jewelry ivories architecture and other art media. It was a conservative tradition whose style changed very little over time. Much of the surviving examples comes from tombs and monuments giving insight into the ancient Egyptian afterlife beliefs. The ancient Egyptian language had no word for art. Artworks served an essentially functional purpose that was bound with religion and ideology. To render a subject in art was to give it permanence. Therefore ancient Egyptian art portrayed an idealized unrealistic view of the world. There was no significant tradition of individual artistic expression since art served a wider and cosmic purpose of maintaining order Maat. Art of PreDynastic Egypt 60003000 BCedit Artifacts of Egypt from the Prehistoric period 44003100 BC clockwise from top left a Badarian ivory figurine a Naqada jar a Bat figurine a cosmetic palette a flint knife and a diorite vase. PreDynastic Egypt corresponding to the Neolithic period of the prehistory of Egypt spanned from c.6000 BC to the beginning of the Early Dynastic Period around 3100 BC. Continued expansion of the desert forced the early ancestors of the Egyptians to settle around the Nile and adopt a more sedentary lifestyle during the Neolithic. The period from 9000 to 6000 BC has left very little archaeological evidence but around 6000 BC Neolithic settlements began to appear all over Egypt.1 Studies based on morphological2 genetic3 and archaeological data4 have attributed these settlements to migrants from the Fertile Crescent returning during the Neolithic Revolution bringing agriculture to the region.5 Merimde culture 50004200 BCedit From about 5000 to 4200 BC the Merimde culture known only from a large settlement site at the edge of the Western Nile Delta flourished in Lower Egypt. The culture has strong connections to the Faiyum A culture as well as the Levant. People lived in small huts produced simple undecorated pottery and had stone tools. Cattle sheep goats and pigs were raised and wheat sorghum and barley were planted. The Merimde people buried their dead within the settlement and produced clay figurines.6 The first Egyptian lifesize head made of clay comes from Merimde.7 Badarian culture 44004000 BCedit The Badarian culture from about 4400 to 4000 BC8 is named for the Badari site near Der Tasa. It followed the Tasian culture c. 4500 BC but was so similar that many consider them one continuous period. The Badarian culture continued to produce blacktopware pottery albeit much improved in quality and was assigned sequence dating SD numbers 21
29.9  The primary difference that prevents scholars from merging the two periods is that Badarian sites use copper in addition to stone and are thus chalcolithic settlements while the Neolithic Tasian sites are still considered Stone Age.9 A Badarian burial. 45003850 BC Mortuary figurine of a woman 44004000 BC crocodile bone height 
8.7  cm Louvre String of beads 44003800 BC the beads are made of bone serpentinite and shell length 15 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Vase in the shape of a hippopotamus. Early Predynastic Badarian. 
5 th millennium BC Naqada culture 40003000 BCedit The Naqada culture is an archaeological culture of Chalcolithic Predynastic Egypt c. 44003000 BC named for the town of Naqada Qena Governorate. It is divided into three subperiods Naqada I II and III. Naqada Iedit The Amratian Naqada I culture lasted from about 4000 to 3500 BC.8 Blacktopped ware continues to appear but white crossline ware  a type of pottery which has been decorated with crossing sets of close parallel white lines  is also found at this time. The Amratian period falls between 30 and 39 SD.10 Ovoid Naqada I Amratian blacktopped terracotta vase c. 38003500 BC Ibex comb 38003500 BC hippopotamus ivory 
6.5   
3.8   
0.2  cm Louvre Figurine of a bearded man 38003500 BC breccia from Upper Egypt Muse des Confluences Lyon France White crosslined bowl with four legs 37003500 BC painted pottery height 
15.6  cm diameter 
19.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Naqada IIedit The Gebel elArak Knife 3200 BC Egyptian prehistoric Gebel elArak Knife ivory handle back Abydos Egypt. Louvre Museum.11 Mesopotamian king as Master of Animals on the Gebel elArak Knife. This work of art both shows the influence of Mesopotamia on Egypt at an early date during a period of EgyptMesopotamia relations and the state of Mesopotamian royal iconography during the Uruk period.1112 The Gerzean culture Naqada II from about 3500 to 3200 BC8 is named after the site of Gerzeh. It was the next stage in Egyptian cultural development and it was during this time that the foundation of Dynastic Egypt was laid. Gerzean culture is largely an unbroken development of Amratian culture starting in the Nile delta and moving south through Upper Egypt but failing to dislodge Amratian culture in Nubia.13 Gerzean pottery has been assigned SD values of 40 through 62 and is distinctly different from Amratian white crosslined wares or blacktopped ware.10 It was painted mostly in dark red with pictures of animals people and ships as well as geometric symbols that appear to have been derived from animals.13 Wavy handles which were rare before this period though occasionally found as early as SD 35 became more common and more elaborate until they were almost completely ornamental.10 During this period distinctly foreign objects and art forms entered Egypt indicating contact with several parts of Asia particularly with Mesopotamia. Objects such as the Gebel elArak Knife handle which has patently Mesopotamian relief carvings on it have been found in Egypt14 and the silver which appears in this period can only have been obtained from Asia Minor.13 In addition Egyptian objects were created which clearly mimic Mesopotamian forms.15 Cylinder seals appeared in Egypt as well as recessed paneling architecture. The Egyptian reliefs on cosmetic palettes were made in the same style as the contemporary Mesopotamian Uruk culture and ceremonial mace heads from the late Gerzean and early Semainean were crafted in the Mesopotamian pearshaped style instead of the Egyptian native style.16 The route of this trade is difficult to determine but contact with Canaan does not predate the early dynastic so it is usually assumed to have been by water.17 During the time when the Dynastic Race Theory was popular it was theorized that Uruk sailors circumnavigated Arabia but a Mediterranean route probably by middlemen through Byblos is more likely as evidenced by the presence of Byblian objects in Egypt.17 The fact that so many Gerzean sites are at the mouths of wadis which lead to the Red Sea may indicate some amount of trade via the Red Sea though Byblian trade potentially could have crossed the Sinai and then taken to the Red Sea.18 Also it is considered unlikely that something as complicated as recessed panel architecture could have worked its way into Egypt by proxy and at least a small contingent of migrants is often suspected.17 Despite this evidence of foreign influence Egyptologists generally agree that the Gerzean Culture is predominantly indigenous to Egypt. Decorated ware jar illustrating boats and trees 36503500 BC painted pottery height 
16.2  cm diameter 
12.9  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Female figure c. 3600 BC terracotta 
29.2   14  
5.7  cm from Mamariya Egypt Brooklyn Museum New York City Amulet in the form of a head of an elephant 35003300 BC serpentine the green part and bone the eyes 
3.5   
3.6   
2.1  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City The Gebel elArak Knife 33003200 BC elephant ivory the handle and flint the blade length 
25.5  cm most likely from Abydos Egypt Louvre Jar with lug handles c. 35003050 BC diorite height 13 cm Los Angeles County Museum of Art US Protodynastic Period Naqada IIIedit Main article Naqada III The Naqada III period from about 3200 to 3000 BC8 is generally taken to be identical with the Protodynastic period during which Egypt was unified. Naqada III is notable for being the first era with hieroglyphs though this is disputed the first regular use of serekhs the first irrigation and the first appearance of royal cemeteries.19 The art of the Naqada III period was quite sophisticated exemplified by cosmetic palettes. These were used in predynastic Egypt to grind and apply ingredients for facial or body cosmetics. By the Protodynastic period the decorative palettes appear to have lost this function and were instead commemorative ornamental and possibly ceremonial. They were made almost exclusively from siltstone which originated from quarries in the Wadi Hammamat. Many of the palettes were found at Hierakonpolis a center of power in predynastic Upper Egypt. After the unification of the country the palettes ceased to be included in tomb assemblages. Squat vase with lug handles 30502920 BC porphyry 11  20 cm Los Angeles County Museum of Art US The Davis comb 32003100 BC ivory 
5.5   
3.9   
0.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art The Battlefield palette 3100 BC mudstone width 
28.7  cm depth 1 cm from Abydos Egypt British Museum London Baboon Divinity bearing name of Pharaoh Narmer on its base c. 3100 BC calcite height 52 cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin Germany Both sides of the Bull palette c. 32003000 BC greywacke or schist 25 cm Louvre Art of Dynastic Egyptedit Early Dynastic Period 31002685 BCedit See also Early Dynastic Period of Egypt The Early Dynastic Period of Egypt immediately follows the unification of Upper and Lower Egypt c. 3100 BC. It is generally taken to include the First and Second Dynasties lasting from the end of the Naqada III archaeological period until about 2686 BC or the beginning of the Old Kingdom.8 Cosmetic palettes reached a new level of sophistication during this period in which the Egyptian writing system also experienced further development. Initially Egyptian writing was composed primarily of a few symbols denoting amounts of various substances. In the cosmetic palettes symbols were used together with pictorial descriptions. By the end of the Third Dynasty this had been expanded to include more than 200 symbols both phonograms and ideograms.20 Both sides of the Narmer Palette c. 3100 BC greywacke height 63 cm from Hierakonpolis Egypt Egyptian Museum Cairo Tag depicting king Den c. 3000 BC ivory 
4.5   
5.3  cm from Abydos Egypt British Museum London21 Stela of Raneb c. 2880 BC granite height 1 m width 41 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Bracelet c. 2650 BC gold diameter 6 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Old Kingdom 26862181 BCedit Main article Old Kingdom of Egypt The Old Kingdom of Egypt is the period spanning c. 26862181 BC. It is also known as the Age of the Pyramids or the Age of the Pyramid Builders as it encompasses the reigns of the great pyramid builders of the Fourth Dynasty. King Sneferu perfected the art of pyramidbuilding and the pyramids of Giza were constructed under the kings Khufu Khafre and Menkaure.22 Egypt attained its first sustained peak of civilization the first of three socalled Kingdom periods followed by the Middle Kingdom and New Kingdom which mark the high points of civilization in the lower Nile Valley. The Pyramid of Djoser at Saqqara 26672648 BC by Imhotep the most famous step pyramid of Egypt Statue of Menkaure with Hathor and Cynopolis 25512523 BC schist height 
95.5  cm Egyptian Museum Cairo. Demonstrates a group statue with Old Kingdom features and proportions.23 Statues of Prince Rahotep and Nofreta circa 26132494 BC Egyptian museum at Cairo Wooden statue of the scribe Kaaper c. 2450 BC wood copper and rock crystal height 
1.1  m from Saqqara Egyptian Museum Cairo seated scribe at louvre museum Seated portrait statue of Dersenedj scribe and administrator circa 2400 BC rose granite height 68 cm from Giza Egyptian Museum of Berlin Seated portrait group of Dersenedj and his wife Nofretka circa 2400 BC rose granite Egyptian Museum of Berlin Middle Kingdom c. 20551650 BCedit Main article Middle Kingdom of Egypt A room from the tomb of Sarenput II at Aswan Egypt. The rough translation of the wall is Blessed in the service of Satet mistress of the Elephantine and of Nekhbet NabureNakht. NaburNakht was another name of Sarenput. The Middle Kingdom of Egypt a.k.a. the Period of Reunification is marked by political division known as the First Intermediate Period. The Middle Kingdom lasted from around 2050 BC to around 1710 BC from the reunification of Egypt under the reign of Mentuhotep II of the Eleventh Dynasty to the end of the Twelfth Dynasty. The Eleventh Dynasty ruled from Thebes and the Twelfth Dynasty ruled from elLisht. During the Middle Kingdom period Osiris became the most important deity in popular religion.24 The Middle Kingdom was followed by the Second Intermediate Period of Egypt another period of division that involved foreign invasions of the country by the Hyksos of West Asia. After the reunification of Egypt in the Middle Kingdom the kings of the Eleventh and Twelfth Dynasties were able to return their focus to art. In the Eleventh Dynasty the kings monuments were made in a style influenced by the Memphite models of the Fifth and early Sixth Dynasties and the preunification Theban relief style all but disappeared. These changes had an ideological purpose as the Eleventh Dynasty kings were establishing a centralized state and returning to the political ideals of the Old Kingdom.25 In the early Twelfth Dynasty the artwork had a uniformity of style due to the influence of the royal workshops. It was at this point that the quality of artistic production for the elite members of society reached a high point that was never surpassed although it was equaled during other periods.26 Egypts prosperity in the late Twelfth Dynasty was reflected in the quality of the materials used for royal and private monuments. An Osiride statue of the first pharaoh of the Middle Kingdom Mentuhotep II 20612010 BC painted sandstone 138  47 cm Egyptian Museum Cairo Portrait head of an Egyptian from Thebes circa 2000 BC granite Egyptian Museum of Berlin Germany Scarab circa 1980 BC gold overall 
1.1  cm Cleveland Museum of Art Cleveland Ohio US Coffin of Senbi 19181859 BC gessoed and painted cedar overall 70 x 55 cm Cleveland Museum of Art Jewelry chest of Sithathoryunet 18871813 BC ebony ivory gold carnelian blue faience and silver height 
36.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Mirror with a papyrusshaped handle 18101700 BC unalloyed copper gold and ebony 
22.3   
11.3   
2.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art A guardian statue which reflects the facial features of the reigning king probably Amenemhat I or Senwosret I and which functioned as a divine guardian for the imiut. Made of cedar wood and plaster c. 19191885 BC27 Relief from the chapel of the overseer of the troops Sehetepibre 18021640 BC painted limestone 
30.5   
42.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Lintel of Amenemhat I and deities 19811952 BC painted limestone 
36.8   172 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City A group of West Asiatic peoples possibly Canaanites and precursors of the future Hyksos depicted entering Egypt circa 1900 BC. From the tomb of a 
12 th dynasty official Khnumhotep II.28293031 Second Intermediate Period c. 16501550 BCedit Main articles Second Intermediate Period of Egypt and Hyksos The socalled Hyksos Sphinxes The socalled Hyksos Sphinxes are peculiar sphinxes of Amenemhat III which were reinscribed by several Hyksos rulers including Apepi. Earlier Egyptologists thought these were the faces of actual Hyksos rulers.32 The Hyksos a dynasty of rulers originating from the Levant do not appear to have produced any court art33 instead appropriating monuments from earlier dynasties by writing their names on them. Many of these are inscribed with the name of King Khyan.34 A large palace at Avaris has been uncovered built in the Levantine rather than the Egyptian style most likely by Khyan.35 King Apepi is known to have patronized Egyptian scribal culture commissioning the copying of the Rhind Mathematical Papyrus.36 The stories preserved in the Westcar Papyrus may also date from his reign.37 The socalled Hyksos sphinxes or Tanite sphinxes are a group of royal sphinxes depicting the earlier Pharaoh Amenemhat III Twelfth Dynasty with some unusual traits compared to conventional statuary for example prominent cheekbones and the thick mane of a lion instead of the traditional nemes headcloth. The name Hyksos sphinxes was given due to the fact that these were later reinscribed by several of the Hyksos kings and were initially thought to represent the Hyksos kings themselves. Nineteenthcentury scholars attempted to use the statues features to assign a racial origin to the Hyksos.38 These sphinxes were seized by the Hyksos from cities of the Middle Kingdom and then transported to their capital Avaris where they were reinscribed with the names of their new owners and adorned their palace.32 Seven of those sphinxes are known all from Tanis and now mostly located in the Cairo Museum.3239 Other statues of Amenehat III were found in Tanis and are associated with the Hyksos in the same manner. An official wearing the mushroomheaded hairstyle also seen in contemporary paintings of Western Asiatic foreigners such as in the tomb of Khnumhotep II at Beni Hasan. Excavated in Avaris the Hyksos capital. Staatliche Sammlung fr gyptische Kunst.40414243 Lion inscribed with the name of the Hyksos ruler Khyan found in Baghdad suggesting relations with Babylon. The prenomen of Khyan and epithet appear on the breast. British Museum EA 9
87.4 445 Electrum dagger handle of a soldier of Hyksos Pharaoh Apepi illustrating the soldier hunting with a short bow and sword. Inscriptions The perfect god the lord of the two lands Nebkhepeshre Apepi and Follower of his lord Nehemen found at a burial at Saqqara.46 Now at the Luxor Museum.4748 An example of Egyptian Tell elYahudiyeh Ware a Levantineinfluenced style. New Kingdom c. 15501069 BCedit Main article New Kingdom of Egypt The New Kingdom also referred to as the Egyptian Empire is the period between the 
16 th and 
11 th centuries BC covering the 
18 th 
19 th and 
20 th dynasties of Egypt. The New Kingdom followed the Second Intermediate Period and was succeeded by the Third Intermediate Period. It was Egypts most prosperous time and marked the peak of its power.49 This tremendous wealth can be attributed to the centralization of bureaucratic power and many successful military campaigns which opened trade routes. With the expansion of the Egyptian Empire Kings gained access to important commodities such as cedar from Lebanon and luxury materials such as lapis lazuli and turquoise. The artwork produced during the New Kingdom falls into three broad periods PreAmarna Amarna and Ramesside. Although stylistic changes as a result of shifts in power and variation of religious ideals occurred the statuary and relief work throughout the New Kingdom continued to embody the main principles of Egyptian art frontality and axiality hierarchy of scale and composite composition. PreAmarnaedit The PreAmarna period the beginning of the eighteenth dynasty of the New Kingdom was marked by the growing power of Egypt as an expansive empire. The artwork reflects a combination of Middle Kingdom techniques and subjects with the newly accessed materials and styles of foreign lands.50 A large portion of the art and architecture of the PreAmarna period was produced by Queen Hatshepshut who led a widespread building campaign to all gods during her reign from 1473 to 1458 B.C.E.. The queen made significant additions to the temple at Karnak undertook the construction of an extensive mortuary temple at Deir elBahri and produced a prolific amount of statuary and relief work in hard stone. The extent of these building projects was made possible by the centralization of power in Thebes and reopening of trade routes by previous New Kingdom ruler Ahmose I.51 The Queens elaborate mortuary temple at Deir elBahri provides many wellpreserved examples of the artwork produced during the PreAmarna period. The massive threelevel colonnaded temple was built into the cliffs of Thebes and adorned with extensive painted relief. Subjects of these reliefs ranged from traditional funerary images and legitimization of Hatshepsut as the divine ruler of Egypt to battle and expedition scenes in foreign lands. The temple also housed numerous statues of the Queen and gods particularly Amunra some of which were colossal in scale. The artwork from Hatshepshuts reign is trademarked by the reintegration of Northern culture and style as a result of the reunification of Egypt. Thutmoses III the predecessor to the Queen also commissioned vast amounts of largescale artwork and by his death Egypt was the most powerful empire in the world.51 StateSponsored Templesedit During the New Kingdom  the 
18 th Dynasty especially  it was common for Kings to commission large and elaborate temples dedicated to the major gods of Egypt. These structures built from limestone or sandstone materials more permanent than the mud brick used for earlier temples and filled with rare materials and vibrant wall paintings exemplify the wealth and access to resources that Egyptian Empire enjoyed during the New Kingdom. The temple at Karnak dedicated to Amunra is one of the largest and best surviving examples of this type of statesponsored architecture.50 Eye 15501069 BC alabaster eye from a coffin length 
50.8  mm Auckland War Memorial Museum Auckland New Zealand Ushabti of Amenhotep II 14271400 BC serpentine 29  9  
0.6 5 cm 
1.4  kg British Museum London Arm panel from a ceremonial chair of Thutmose IV 14001390 BC wood ficus sycomorus height 
25.1  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Gaming board inscribed for Amenhotep III with separate sliding drawer 13901353 BC glazed faience 
5.5   
7.7   21 cm Brooklyn Museum New York City Head of Amenhotep III 13901352 BC quartzite 24  20 cm 
9.8  kg British Museum Baboon figurine 13901352 BC quartzite 
68.5   
38.5   45 cm 180 kg estimated British Museum Statuette of the lady Tiye 13901349 BC wood carnelian gold glass Egyptian blue and paint height 24 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Abu Simbel Temple of Ramesses II Syrians bringing presents to Tuthmosis III in the tomb of Rekhmire circa 1450 BCE. They are labeled Chiefs of Retjenu.5253 Amarna art c. 1350 BCedit Main article Amarna art The Bust of Nefertiti 13521336 BC limestone plaster  paint height 48 cm from Amarna Egypt Egyptian Museum of Berlin Germany Amarna art is named for the extensive archeological site at Tel elAmarna where Pharaoh Akhenaten moved the capital in the late Eighteenth Dynasty. This period and the years leading up to it constitute the most drastic interruption in the style of Egyptian art in the Old Middle and New Kingdoms as a result of the rising prominence of the New Solar Theology and the eventual shift towards Atenism under Akhenaten.54 Amarna art is characterized by a sense of movement and a subjective and sensual perception of reality as it appeared in the world. Scenes often include overlapping figures creating the sensation of a crowd which was less common in earlier times. The artwork produced under Akhenaten was a reflection of the dramatic changes in culture style and religion that occurred under Akhenatens rule. Sometimes called the New Solar Theology the new religion was a monotheistic worship of the sun the Aten. Akhenaten placed emphasis on himself as the coregent along with the Aten as well as the mouthpiece of the Aten himself. Since the sun disk was worshiped at the ultimate lifegiving power in this new theology anything the suns rays touched were blessed by this force. As a result sacrifices and worship were likely conducted in open courtyards and the sunken relief technique which works best for outdoors carvings was also used for indoor works. Portrayal of the human body shifted drastically under the reign of Akhenaten. For instance many depictions of Akhenatens body give him distinctly feminine qualities such as large hips prominent breasts and a larger stomach and thighs. Facial representations of Akhenaten such as in the sandstone Statue of Akhenaten display him with an elongated chin full lips and hollow cheeks. These stylistic features extended past representations of Akhenaten and were further employed in the depiction of all figures of the royal family as observed in the Portrait of Meritaten and Fragment of a queens face. This is a divergence from the earlier Egyptian art which emphasized idealized youth and masculinity for male figures. A notable innovation from the reign of Akhenaten was the religious elevation of the royal family including Akhenatens wife Nefertiti and their three daughters.55 While earlier periods of Egyptian art depicted the king as the primary link between humanity and the gods the Amarna period extended this power to those of the royal family.55 As visualized in the relief of a royal family and the different talatat blocks each figure of the royal family is touched by the rays of the Aten. Nefertiti specifically is believed to have held a significant cultic role during this period.56 Not many buildings from this period have survived partially as they were constructed with standardsized blocks known as talatat which were very easy to remove and reuse. Temples in Amarna following the trend did not follow traditional Egyptian customs and were open without ceilings and had no closing doors. In the generations after Akhenatens death artists reverted to the traditional Egyptian styles of earlier periods. There were still traces of this periods style in later art but in most respects Egyptian art like Egyptian religion resumed its usual characteristics as though the period had never happened. Amarna itself was abandoned and considerable effort was undertaken to deface monuments from the reign including disassembling buildings and reusing the blocks with their decoration facing inwards as has recently been discovered in one later building.57 The last King of the Eighteenth Dynasty Horemheb sought to eliminate the influence of Amarna art and culture and reinstate the tradition powerful of the cult of Amun.58 Relief of the royal family Akhenaten Nefertiti and the three daughters 13521336 BC painted limestone 25  20 cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin Germany Portrait of Meritaten 13511332 BC painted limestone height 
15.4  cm Louvre Statue of Akhenaten c. 1350 BC painted sandstone 
1.3   
0.8   
0.6  m Louvre Talatat block with relief showing Nefertiti at prayer circa 1350 BC painted sandstone height 
23.4  cm from Karnak Egyptian Museum of Berlin Talatat block with Akhenaton standing to the right raising his hands in prayer to the rays of the sun god Aten circa 1350 BC painted sandstone from Karnak Egyptian Museum of Berlin Shabti of Akhenaten 13531336 BC faience height 11 cm width 
7.6  cm depth 
5.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Fragment of a queens face 13531336 BC yellow jasper height 13 cm width 
12.5  cm depth 
12.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Cosmetic dish in the shape of a trussed duck 13531327 BC hippopotamus ivory tinted duck left length 
9.5  cm width 
4.6  cm cover right length 
7.3  cm width 4 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Ramesside Periodedit Portrait of Ramesses IX ruled 11291111 BC from his tomb KV6. 
20 th Dynasty. With a concerted effort from Horemheb the last King of Dynasty Eighteen to eradicate all Amarna art and influence the style of the art and architecture of the Empire transitioned into the Ramesside Period for the remainder of the New Kingdom Nineteen and Twentieth Dynasties.51 In response to the religious and artistic revolution of the Amarna period statecommissioned works demonstrate a clear return to tradition forms and renewed dedication to Amunra. However some elements of Amarna bodily proportion persist the small of the back does not move back to its lower Middle Kingdom height and human limbs remain somewhat elongated. With some modifications 
19 th and 
20 th Dynasty Kings continued to build their funerary temples which were dedicated to Amunra and located in Thebes in their predecessors style. The Ramses Kings also continued to build colossal statues such as those commissioned by Hatshepsut.50 During the Ramesside period kings made further contributions to the Temple at Karnak. The Great Hypostyle Hall commissioned by Sety I 
19 th Dynasty consisted of 134 sandstone columns supporting a 
20 meterhigh ceiling and covering an acre of land. Sety I decorated most surfaces with intricate basrelief while his successor Ramses II added sunken relief work to the walls and columns in the southern side of the Great Hall. The interior carvings show kinggod interactions such as traditional legitimization of power scenes processions and rituals. Expansive depictions of military campaigns cover the exterior walls of Hypostyle Hall. Battle scenes illustrating chaotic disordered enemies strewn over the conquered land and the victorious king as the most prominent figure trademark the Ramesside period.50 The last period of the New Kingdom demonstrates a return to traditional Egyptian form and style but the culture is not purely a reversion to the past. The art of the Ramesside period demonstrates the integration of canonized Egypt forms with modern innovations and materials. Advancements such as adorning all surfaces of tombs with paintings and relief and the addition of new funerary texts to burial chambers demonstrate the nonstatic nature of this period.50 Third Intermediate Period c.1069664 BCedit Main articles Third Intermediate Period of Egypt and Black Pharaohs Taharqa Tantamani Senkamanisken Statues of the Black Pharaohs rulers of the 
25 th Dynasty and the Kingdom of Kush in the Louvre Museum golden colors reconstructed through color pigment analysis The Third Intermediate Period was one of decline and political instability coinciding with the Late Bronze Age collapse of civilizations in the Near East and Eastern Mediterranean including the Greek Dark Ages. It was marked by division of the state for much of the period and conquest and rule by foreigners.59 After an early period of fracturation the country was firmly reunited by the Twentysecond Dynasty founded by Shoshenq I in 945 BC or 943 BC who descended from Meshwesh immigrants originally from Ancient Libya. The next period of the Twentyfourth Dynasty saw the increasing influence of the Nubian kingdom to the south took full advantage of this division and the ensuing political instability. Then around 732 BC Piye marched north and defeated the combined might of several native Egyptian rulers Peftjaubast Osorkon IV of Tanis Iuput II of Leontopolis and Tefnakht of Sais. He established the Twentyfifth Dynasty of Black Pharaos originating from Nubia. The Third Intermediate Period generally sees a return to archaic Egyptian styles with particular reference to the art of the Old and Middle Kingdom.60 The art of the period essentially consists in traditional Egyptian styles reintroduced for unknown reasons as early as Shoshenq V or Osorkon III61 sometimes with the inclusion of some foreign characteristics such as the particular iconography of the statues of the Nubian rulers of the Twentyfifth Dynasty.60 Although the Twentyfifth Dynasty controlled Ancient Egypt for only 73 years it holds an important place in Egyptian history due to the restoration of traditional Egyptian values culture art and architecture combined with some original creations such as the monumental column of Taharqa in Karnak.6263 During the 
25 th dynasty Egypt was ruled from Napata in Nubia now in modern Sudan and the Dynasty in turn permitted the expansion of Egyptian architectural styles to Lower Egypt and Nubia.60 Pyramid of Piye a Nubian king who conquered Upper Egypt and brought it under his control at ElKurru Sudan Chapel of the Black Pharaoh Taharqa and his sister Shepenupet II in Karnak Monumental column elevated by the Black Pharaoh Taharqa in Karnak63 Taharqa offering wine jars to Falcongod Hemen63 690664 BC bronze greywacke gold and wood length 26 cm height 
19.7  cm width 
10.3  cm Louvre Late Period c. 664332 BCedit Main articles Late Period of ancient Egypt and Achaemenid Egypt Egyptian statue of Achaemenid Emperor Darius I as Pharaoh of the Twentyseventh Dynasty of Egypt64 522486 BC greywacke height 
2.4 6 m65 National Museum of Iran Teheran In 525 BC the political state of Egypt was taken over by the Persians almost a century and a half into Egypts Late Period. By 404 BC the Persians were expelled from Egypt starting a short period of independence. These 60 years of Egyptian rule were marked by an abundance of usurpers and short reigns. The Egyptians were then reoccupied by the Achaemenids until 332 BC with the arrival of Alexander the Great. Sources state that the Egyptians were cheering when Alexander entered the capital since he drove out the immensely disliked Persians. The Late Period is marked with the death of Alexander the Great and the start of the Ptolemaic dynasty.66 Although this period marks political turbulence and immense change for Egypt its art and culture continued to flourish. This can be seen in Egyptian temples starting with the Thirtieth Dynasty the fifth dynasty in the Late Period and extending into the Ptolemaic era.citation needed These temples ranged from the Delta to the island of Philae.66 While Egypt underwent outside influences through trade and conquest by foreign states these temples remained in the traditional Egyptian style with very little Hellenistic influence.citation needed Another relief originating from the Thirtieth Dynasty was the rounded modeling of the body and limbs66 which gave the subjects a more fleshy or heavy effect. For example for female figures their breasts would swell and overlap the upper arm in painting. In more realistic portrayals men would be fat or wrinkled. Another type of art that became increasingly common during this period was the Horus stelae.66 These originate from the late New Kingdom and intermediate period but were increasingly common during the fourth century to the Ptolemaic era. These statues would often depict a young Horus holding snakes and standing on some kind of dangerous beast. The depiction of Horus comes from the Egyptian myth where a young Horus is saved from a scorpion bite resulting in his gaining power over all dangerous animals. These statues were used to ward off attacks from harmful creatures and to cure snake bites and scorpion stings.66 Egyptian man in a Persian costume c.343332 BC accession number 
71.1 39 Brooklyn Museum.67 Composite papyrus capital 380343 BC painted sandstone height 126 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Magical stela or cippus of Horus 332280 BC chlorite schist height 
20.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Relief showing Darius I offering lettuces to Amun in the Temple of Hibis Kharga Oasis Egypt Ptolemaic Period 30530 BCedit Stele limestone 
52.4   28  4 cm Louvre. A votive inscription dedicated by a Greek called Onnophris that depicts a male pharaoh presenting offerings to the goddess Isis but honours in its text a queen Cleopatra probably Cleopatra VII.note 1 Main article Ptolemaic Kingdom Discoveries made since the end of the 
19 th century surrounding the now submerged ancient Egyptian city of Heracleion at Alexandria include a 
4 th century BC unusually sensual detailed and feministic as opposed to deified depiction of Isis marking a combination of Egyptian and Hellenistic forms beginning around the time of Egypts conquest by Alexander the Great in 332331 BC. However this was atypical of Ptolemaic sculpture which generally avoided mixing Egyptian styles with the Hellenistic style used in the court art of the Ptolemaic dynasty68 while temples in the rest of the country continued using late versions of traditional Egyptian formulae.69 Scholars have proposed an Alexandrian style in Hellenistic sculpture but there is in fact little to connect it with Alexandria.70 Marble was extensively used in court art although it all had to be imported and use was made of various marblesaving techniques such as using a number of pieces attached with stucco a head might have the beard the back of the head and hair in separate pieces.71 In contrast to the art of other Hellenistic kingdoms Ptolemaic royal portraits are generalized and idealized with little concern for achieving an individual portrait though coins allow some portrait sculpture to be identified as one of the fifteen King Ptolemys.72 Many later portraits have clearly had the face reworked to show a later king.73 One Egyptian trait was to give much greater prominence to the queens than other successor dynasties to Alexander with the royal couple often shown as a pair. This predated the 
2 nd century when a series of queens exercised real power.74 In the 
2 nd century Egyptian temple sculptures began to reuse court models in their faces and sculptures of a priest often used a Hellenistic style to achieve individually distinctive portrait heads.75 Many small statuettes were produced with the most common types being Alexander a generalized King Ptolemy and a naked Aphrodite. Pottery figurines included grotesques and fashionable ladies of the Tanagra figurine style.69 Erotic groups featured absurdly large phalli. Some fittings for wooden interiors include very delicately patterned polychrome falcons in faience. Ptolemy XII making offerings to Egyptian Gods in the Temple of Hathor 54 BC Dendera Egypt Doublesided votive relief c. 305 BC limestone 
8.3   
6.5   
1.4  cm Cleveland Museum of Art Cleveland Ohio US Statue of the goddess RaetTawy 33230 BC limestone 46  
13.7   
23.7  cm Louvre Ibis coffin 30530 BC wood silver gold and rock crystal 
38.2   
20.2   
55.8  cm Brooklyn Museum New York City Statue of a Ptolemaic king 
1 st century BC basalt height 82 cm width 
39.5  cm Louvre Roman Period 30 BC619 ADedit See also Egypt Roman province Roman statue of Isis first or second century CE. She holds a sistrum and a pitcher of water although these attributes were added in a seventeenth century renovation.76 Roman Emperor Trajan ruled 98117 AD making offerings to Egyptian Gods on the Roman Mammisi at the Dendera Temple complex Egypt.77 The Fayum mummy portraits are probably the most famous example of Egyptian art during the Roman period of Egypt. They were a type of naturalistic painted portrait on wooden boards attached to upper class mummies from Roman Egypt. They belong to the tradition of panel painting one of the most highly regarded forms of art in the Classical world. The Fayum portraits are the only large body of art from that tradition to have survived. Mummy portraits have been found across Egypt but are most common in the Faiyum Basin particularly from Hawara hence the common name and the Hadrianic Roman city Antinoopolis. Faiyum portraits is generally used as a stylistic rather than a geographic description. While painted cartonnage mummy cases date back to pharaonic times the Faiyum mummy portraits were an innovation dating to the time of the Roman occupation of Egypt.78 The portraits date to the Imperial Roman era from the late 
1 st century BC or the early 
1 st century AD onwards. It is not clear when their production ended but recent research suggests the middle of the 
3 rd century. They are among the largest groups among the very few survivors of the panel painting tradition of the classical world which was continued into Byzantine and Western traditions in the postclassical world including the local tradition of Coptic iconography in Egypt. The Fayum mummy portraits epitomize the meeting of Egyptian and Roman cultures. Mummy mask of a man early 
1 st century AD stucco gilded and painted 
51.5  x 33 x 20 cm Brooklyn Museum New York City Portrait of a young woman in red c. 90120  encaustic painting on limewood with gold leaf height 38 cm 15 in Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Statue of Anubis 100138 marble height 
1.5  m width 50 cm from Tivoli Rome Vatican Museums Vatican City79 Horus as emperor 
2 nd century bronze height 
26.5  cm Louvre Mummy portrait of a man late 
1 st century encaustic painting on wood Walters Art Museum Baltimore Maryland US Isis suckling her baby Horus of whom only the left leg is preserved 
1 st century AD siltstone basis limestone height 
33.9  cm from Matana elAsfu Staatliche Sammlung fr gyptische Kunst Munich Germany Characteristicsedit Egyptian art is known for its distinctive figure convention used for the main figures in both relief and painting with parted legs where not seated and head shown as seen from the side but the torso seen as from the front. The figures also have a standard set of proportions measuring 18 fists from the ground to the hairline on the forehead.80 This appears as early as the Narmer Palette from Dynasty I but this idealized figure convention is not employed in the use of displaying minor figures shown engaged in some activity such as captives and corpses.81 Other conventions make statues of males darker than those of females. Very conventionalized portrait statues appear from as early as the Second Dynasty before 2780 BC82 and with the exception of the art of the Amarna period of Ahkenaten83 and some other periods such as the Twelfth Dynasty the idealized features of rulers like other Egyptian artistic conventions changed little until the Greek conquest.84 Egyptian art uses hierarchical proportions where the size of figures indicates their relative importance. The gods or the divine pharaoh are usually larger than other figures while the figures of high officials or the tomb owner are usually smaller and at the smallest scale are any servants entertainers animals trees and architectural details.85 Anonymityedit Depiction of craftworkers in ancient Egypt Ancient Egyptian artists rarely left their names. The Egyptian artwork is anonymous also because most of the time it was collective. Diodorus of Sicily who traveled and lived in Egypt has written So after the craftsmen have decided the height of the statue they all go home to make the parts which they have chosen I 
98.8 6 Symbolismedit Symbolism pervaded Egyptian art and played an important role in establishing a sense of order. The pharaohs regalia for example represented his power to maintain order. Animals were also highly symbolic figures in Egyptian art. Some colors were expressive.87 The ancient Egyptian language had four basic color terms kem black hedj whitesilver wadj greenblue and desher redorangeyellow. Blue for example symbolized fertility birth and the lifegiving waters of the Nile.
88 failed verification Blue and green were the colors of vegetation and hence of rejuvenation. Osiris could be shown with green skin in the 
26 th Dynasty the faces of coffins were often colored green to assist in rebirth.89 This color symbolism explains the popularity of turquoise and faience in funerary equipment. The use of black for royal figures similarly expressed the fertile alluvial soil87 of the Nile from which Egypt was born and carried connotations of fertility and regeneration. Hence statues of the king as Osiris often showed him with black skin. Black was also associated with the afterlife and was the color of funerary deities such as Anubis. Gold indicated divinity due to its unnatural appearance and association with precious materials.87 Furthermore gold was regarded by the ancient Egyptians as the flesh of the god.90 Silver referred to as white gold by the Egyptians was likewise called the bones of the god.90 Red orange and yellow were ambivalent colors. They were naturally associated with the sun red stones such as quartzite were favored for royal statues which stressed the solar aspects of kingship. Carnelian has similar symbolic associations in jewelry. Red ink was used to write important names on papyrus documents. Red was also the color of the deserts and hence associated with Set. Materialsedit Faienceedit Main article Egyptian faience Egyptian faience is a ceramic material made of quartz sand or crushed quartz small amounts of lime and plant ash or natron. The ingredients were mixed together glazed and fired to a hard shiny finish. Faience was widely used from the Predynastic Period until Islamic times for inlays and small objects especially ushabtis. More accurately termed glazed composition Egyptian faience was so named by early Egyptologists after its superficial resemblance to the tinglazed earthenwares of medieval Italy originally produced at Faenza. The Egyptian word for it was tjehenet which means dazzling and it was probably used above all as a cheap substitute for more precious materials like turquoise and lapis lazuli. Indeed faience was most commonly produced in shades of bluegreen although a large range of colours was possible.91 William the Faience Hippopotamus 19611878 BC faience 
11.2   
7.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Ushabti 12941279 BC faience height 
28.1  cm width 
9.2  cm Louvre Statuette of Isis and Horus 33230 BC faience height 17 cm width 
5.1  cm depth 
7.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Bowl 200150 BC faience 
4.8   
16.9  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Glassedit Although the glassy materials faience and Egyptian blue were manufactured in Egypt from an early period the technology for making glass itself was only perfected in the early 
18 th Dynasty. It was probably imported from Levant since the Egyptian words for glass are of foreign origin. The funerary objects of Amenhotep II included many glass artefacts demonstrating a range of different techniques. At this period the material was costly and rare and may have been a royal monopoly. However by the end of the 
18 th Dynasty Egypt probably made sufficient quantities to export glass to other parts of the Eastern Mediterranean. Glass workshops have been excavated at Amarna and PiRamesses. The raw materials  silica alkali and lime  were readily available in Egypt although readymade ingots of blue glass were also imported from the Levant and have been found in the cargo of the Uluburun shipwreck off the southern coast of Turkey.92 Kohl vase in the shape of a palm column 15501086 BC glass height 
8.9  cm Walters Art Museum Baltimore US Bottle 13531336 BC glass height 
8.1  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Bottle 12951070 BC glass height 10 cm 4 in Metropolitan Museum of Art Small amphoriskos 664332 BC glass height 7 cm 
2.8  in Metropolitan Museum of Art Egyptian blueedit Main article Egyptian blue Egyptian blue is a material related to but distinct from faience and glass. Also called frit Egyptian blue was made from quartz alkali lime and one or more coloring agents usually copper compounds. These were heated together until they fused to become a crystalline mass of uniform color unlike faience in which the core and the surface layer are of different colors. Egyptian blue could be worked by hand or pressed into molds to make statuettes and other small objects. It could also be ground to produce pigment. It is first attested in the Fourth Dynasty but became particularly popular in the Ptolemaic period and the Roman period when it was known as caeruleum.93 The color blue was used only sparingly even up until as late as Dynasty IV where the color was found adorning matpatterns in the Tomb of Saccara which was constructed during the first Dynasty. Until this discovery was made the color blue had not been known in Egyptian art.94 Powder of Egyptian blue Amphora an example of socalled Egyptian blue ceramic ware 13801300 BC height 
12.6  cm 
4.9  in Walters Art Museum Baltimore US Metalsedit While not a leading center of metallurgy ancient Egypt nevertheless developed technologies for extracting and processing the metals found within its borders and in neighbouring lands. Copper was the first metal to be exploited in Egypt. Small beads have been found in Badarian graves larger items were produced in the later Predynastic Period by a combination of mouldcasting annealing and coldhammering. The production of copper artifacts peaked in the Old Kingdom when huge numbers of copper chisels were manufactured to cut the stone blocks of pyramids. The copper statues of Pepi I and Merenre from Hierakonpolis are rare survivors of largescale metalworking. The golden treasure of Tutankhamun has come to symbolize the wealth of ancient Egypt and illustrates the importance of gold in pharaonic culture. The burial chamber in a royal tomb was called the house of gold. According to the Egyptian religion the flesh of the gods was made of gold. A shining metal that never tarnished it was the ideal material for cult images of deities for royal funerary equipment and to add brilliance to the tops of obelisks. It was used extensively for jewelry and was distributed to officials as a reward for loyal services the gold of honour. Silver had to be imported from the Levant and its rarity initially gave it greater value than gold which like electrum was readily available within the borders of Egypt and Nubia. Early examples of silverwork include the bracelets of the Hetepheres. By the Middle Kingdom silver seems to have become less valuable than gold perhaps because of increased trade with the Middle East. The treasure from ElTod consisted of a hoard of silver objects probably made in the Aegean while silver jewelry made for female members of the 
12 th Dynasty royal family was found at Dahshur and Lahun. In the Egyptian religion the bones of the gods were said to be made of silver.95 Iron was the last metal to be exploited on a large scale by the Egyptians. Meteoritic iron was used for the manufacture of beads from the Badarian period. However the advanced technology required to smelt iron was not introduced into Egypt until the Late Period. Before that iron objects were imported and were consequently highly valued for their rarity. The Amarna letters refer to diplomatic gifts of iron being sent by Near Eastern rulers especially the Hittites to Amenhotep III and Akhenaten. Iron tools and weapons only became common in Egypt in the Roman Period. AmunRa figurine 1069664 BC silver and gold 24  6  
8.5  cm 
0.7  kg British Museum London Statuette of Amun 945715 BC gold 
17.5   
4.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Figurine of Horus as falcon god with an Egyptian crown circa 500 BC silver and electrum height 
26.9  cm Staatliche Sammlung fr gyptische Kunst Munich Germany Statuette of Isis and Horus 30530 BC solid cast of bronze 
4.8   
10.3  cm Cleveland Museum of Art Cleveland Ohio US Woodedit Because of its relatively poor survival in archaeological contexts wood is not particularly well represented among artifacts from Ancient Egypt. Nevertheless woodworking was evidently carried out to a high standard from an early period. Native trees included date palm and dom palm the trunks of which could be used as joists in buildings or split to produce planks. Tamarisk acacia and sycamore fig were employed in furniture manufacture while ash was used when greater flexibility was required for example in the manufacture of bowls. However all these native timbers were of relatively poor quality finer varieties had to be imported especially from the Levant.96 Model of a procession of offering bearers. Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Figurine of a female servant carrying provisions 19811975 BC painted wood and gesso 112  17 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Model of a sailboat 19811975 BC painted wood plaster linen twine and linen fabric length 145 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Duckshaped box 
16 th
11 th century BC wood and ivory Louvre Figurine of Isis Ptolemaic dynasty painted wood and stucco height 
40.5  cm Roemer und PelizaeusMuseum Hildesheim Hildesheim Germany Lapis lazuliedit See also Lapis lazuli Lapis lazuli is a dark blue semiprecious stone highly valued by the ancient Egyptians because of its symbolic association with the heavens. It was imported via longdistance trade routes from the mountains of northeastern Afghanistan and was considered superior to all other materials except gold and silver. Coloured glass or faience provided a cheap imitation. Lapis lazuli is first attested in the Predynastic Period. A temporary interruption in supply during the Second and Third Dynasties probably reflects political changes in the ancient Near East. Thereafter it was used extensively for jewelry small figurines and amulets.97 Scarab finger ring 18501750 BC diameter 
2.5  cm the scarab 
1.8  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Cult image of Ptah 945600 BC height of the figure 
5.2  cm height of the dais 
0.4  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Falcom amulet 664332 BC height 
2.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Child god Harpokrates amulet 66430 BC height 
4.3  cm width 
1.2  cm depth 
1.6  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Other materialsedit Jasper is an impure form of chalcedony with bands or patches of red green or yellow. Red jasper symbol of life and of positive aspects of the universe was used above all to make amulets. It was ideal for certain amulets such as the tit amulet or tyet also known as knot of Isis to be made of red jasper as specified in Spell 156 of the Book of the Dead. The more rarely used green jasper was especially indicated for making scarabs particularly heart scarabs. Serpentine is the generic term for the hydrated silicates of magnesium. It came mostly from the eastern desert and occurs in many shades of color from a pale green to a dark verging on black. Used from the earliest times it was sought specially for making heart scarabs. Steatite also known as soapstone is a mineral of the chlorite family it has the great advantage of being very easy to work. Steatite amulets are found in contexts from the Predynastic Period on although in subsequent periods it was usually covered in a fine layer of faience and was used in the manufacture of numerous scarabs. Turquoise is an opaque stone sky blue to bluegreen. It is a natural aluminium phosphate colored blue by traces of copper. Closely linked to the goddess Hathor it was extracted mainly from mines in Sinai at Serabit elKhadim. The Egyptians were particularly fond of the greenish shades symbolic of dynamism and vital renewal. In the Late Period turquoise like lapis lazuli was synonymous with joy and delight. Pendant circa 1069 BC gold and turquoise overall 
5.1  x 
2.3  cm Cleveland Museum of Art Cleveland USA Heart scarab of Hatnefer 14921473 BC serpentine the scarab and gold 
5.3   
2.8  cm chain 
77.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Head from a spoon in the form of a swimming girl 13901353 BC travertine the head and steatite the hair 
2.8   
2.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Amulet 12951070 BC red jasper 
2.3   
1.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Sculptureedit Pharaoh Menkaura and queen Khamerernebty II 24902472 BC greywacke overall 1
42.2   
57.1   
55.2  cm 56  
22.4   
21.7  in Museum of Fine Arts Boston US The monumental sculpture of ancient Egypts temples and tombs is well known98 but refined and delicate small works exist in much greater numbers. The Egyptians used the technique of sunk relief which is best viewed in sunlight for the outlines and forms to be emphasized by shadows. The distinctive pose of standing statues facing forward with one foot in front of the other was helpful for the balance and strength of the piece. This singular pose was used early in the history of Egyptian art and well into the Ptolemaic period although seated statues were common as well. Egyptian pharaohs were always regarded as gods but other deities are much less common in large statues except when they represent the pharaoh as another deity however the other deities are frequently shown in paintings and reliefs. The famous row of four colossal statues outside the main temple at Abu Simbel each show Rameses II a typical scheme though here exceptionally large.99 Most larger sculptures survived from Egyptian temples or tombs massive statues were built to represent gods and pharaohs and their queens usually for open areas in or outside temples. The very early colossal Great Sphinx of Giza was never repeated but avenues lined with very large statues including sphinxes and other animals formed part of many temple complexes. The most sacred cult image of a god in a temple usually held in the naos was in the form of a relatively small boat or barque holding an image of the god and apparently usually in precious metal  none of these are known to have survived. By Dynasty IV 26802565 BC the idea of the Ka statue was firmly established. These were put in tombs as a resting place for the ka portion of the soul and so there is a good number of less conventionalized statues of welloff administrators and their wives many in wood as Egypt is one of the few places in the world where the climate allows wood to survive over millennia and many block statues. The socalled reserve heads plain hairless heads are especially naturalistic though the extent to which there was real portraiture in ancient Egypt is still debated. Early tombs also contained small models of the slaves animals buildings and objects such as boats and later ushabti figures necessary for the deceased to continue his lifestyle in the afterlife.100 However the great majority of wooden sculpture have been lost to decay or probably used as fuel. Small figures of deities or their animal personifications are very common and found in popular materials such as pottery. There were also large numbers of small carved objects from figures of the gods to toys and carved utensils. Alabaster was used for expensive versions of these though painted wood was the most common material and was normal for the small models of animals slaves and possessions placed in tombs to provide for the afterlife. Very strict conventions were followed while crafting statues and specific rules governed the appearance of every Egyptian god. For example the sky god Horus was to be represented with a falcons head the god of funeral rites Anubis was to be shown with a jackals head. Artistic works were ranked according to their compliance with these conventions and the conventions were followed so strictly that over three thousand years the appearance of statues changed very little. These conventions were intended to convey the timeless and nonageing quality of the figures ka.citation needed A common relief in ancient Egyptian sculpture was the difference between the representation of men and women. Women were often represented in an idealistic form young and pretty and rarely shown in an older maturity. Men were shown in either an idealistic manner or a more realistic depiction.49 Sculptures of men often showed men that aged since the regeneration of ageing was a positive thing for them whereas women are shown as perpetually young.101 Both sides of the Narmer Palette c. 3100 BC greywacke height 63 cm from Hierakonpolis Egypt Egyptian Museum Cairo. This very old palette shows the canonical Egyptian profile view and proportions of the figure The Seated Scribe 26132494 BC painted limestone and inlaid quartz height 
53.7  cm Louvre Portrait statue of Henka administrator of the two pyramids of pharaoh Snofru 25002350 BC limestone height 40 cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin Germany The Ka statue of Awibre Hor which provided a physical place for the ka to manifest c. 1700 BC wood rock crystal quartz plaster traces of gold height 
1.7  m from Dahshur Egyptian Museum Cairo Kneeling portrait statue of Amenemhat holding a stele with an inscription circa 1500 BC limestone Egyptian Museum of Berlin Portrait head of pharaoh Hatshepsut or Thutmose III 14801425 BC most probably granite height 
16.5  cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin Amenhotep III 13901352 BC quartzite height 
2.4 9 m Luxor Museum Luxor Egypt102 Portrait statuette of Taitai 13801300 BC greywacke height height 
27.5  cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin The Anubis Shrine 13361327 BC painted wood and gold 
1.1   
2.7   
0.5 2 m from the Valley of the Kings Egyptian Museum Cairo Osiris on a lapis lazuli pillar in the middle flanked by Horus on the left and Isis on the right 875850 BC gold and lapis lazuli 9 cm Louvre Four cats 664332 BC wood height 14 cm width 27 cm Louvre Statuette of Anubis 33230 BC plastered and painted wood 
42.3  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Steleedit Main article Stele Stele of Princess Nefertiabet eating 25892566 BC limestone  paint 
37.7   
52.5   
8.3  cm from Giza Louvre A stele is an upright tablet of stone or wood often with a curved top painted and carved with text and pictures. Numerous examples were produced throughout Egyptian history for a variety of purposes including funerary votive and commemorative. Funerary stelae attested from the early 
1 st Dynasty typically bore the name and titles of the deceased. This basic form which served to identify the tomb owner evolved into a key component of the funerary equipment with a magical function. Hence from the 
2 nd Dynasty onward the owner was usually shown seated before an offering table piled with food and drink in the Middle Kingdom the offering formula was generally inscribed along the top of the stele. Both were designed to ensure a perpetual supply of offerings in the afterlife. Votive stelae inscribed with prayers to deities were dedicated by worshipers seeking a favorable outcome to a particular situation. In the Middle Kingdom many hundreds were set up by pilgrims on the terrace of the great god at Abydos so that they might participate in the annual procession of Osiris. One particular variety of votive stele common in the New Kingdom was the ear stele inscribed with images of human ears to encourage the deity to listen to the prayer or request. Commemorative stelae were produced to proclaim notable achievements for example the stela of Horwerra recording a mining expedition to Serabit elKhadim and the Restoration Stela of Tutankhamun celebrating the restoration of the traditional cults at the end of the Amarna period to celebrate military victories for instance the Merneptah Stele and to establish frontiers for example the Semna stele of Senusret III and the boundary stelae around Amarna.103 Kamose stela circa 1550 BC limestone height 
2.3  m width 
1.1  m depth 
28.5  cm from the Karnak Temple Egypt Luxor Museum Luxor Egypt104 The Bentresh stela 1069715 BC sandstone 227 x 106 x 14 cm Louvre Stela of Pepi chief of the potters 
8 th century BC painted limestone Hermitage Sankt Petersburg Russia Stela of NachtMaheseru 664610 BC polychromy on wood 42  
31.5   
3.5  cm National Museum in Warsaw Poland Pyramidiaedit Main article Pyramidion A pyramidion is a capstone at the top of a pyramid. Called benbenet in ancient Egyptian language it associated the pyramid as a whole with the sacred Benben stone. Pyramidia may have been covered in gold leaf to reflect the rays of the sun in the Middle Kingdom they were often inscribed with royal titles and religious symbols.105 Fragment of a pyramidion c. 1600 BC from Thebes British Museum London Pyramidion from the pyramid of Nebamun circa 1380 BC painted limestone height 23 cm Staatliche Sammlung fr gyptische Kunst Munich Germany Pyramidion from the tomb of the priest Rer in Abydos Egypt. Hermitage Museum Pyramidion of Iufaa 664525 BC painted limestone height 36 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Paintingedit The Meidum geese 25752551 BC painted gypsum 27 x 172 cm Egyptian Museum Cairo Not all Egyptian reliefs were painted and lessprestigious works in tombs temples and palaces were merely painted on a flat surface. Stone surfaces were prepared by whitewash or if rough a layer of coarse mud plaster with a smoother gesso layer above some finer limestones could take paint directly. Pigments were mostly mineral chosen to withstand strong sunlight without fading. The binding medium used in painting remains unclear egg tempera and various gums and resins have been suggested. It is clear that true fresco painted into a thin layer of wet plaster was not used. Instead the paint was applied to dried plaster in what is called fresco a secco in Italian. After painting a varnish or resin was usually applied as a protective coating and many paintings with some exposure to the elements have survived remarkably well although those on fully exposed walls rarely have.106 Small objects including wooden statuettes were often painted using similar techniques. Many ancient Egyptian paintings have survived in tombs and sometimes temples due to Egypts extremely dry climate. The paintings were often made with the intent of making a pleasant afterlife for the deceased. The themes included journeys through the afterworld or protective deities introducing the deceased to the gods of the underworld such as Osiris. Some tomb paintings show activities that the deceased were involved in when they were alive and wished to carry on doing for eternity.citation needed From the New Kingdom period and afterwards the Book of the Dead was buried with the entombed person. It was considered important for an introduction to the afterlife.107 Egyptian paintings are painted in such a way to show a side view and a front view of the animal or person at the same time. For example the painting to the right shows the head from a profile view and the body from a frontal view. Their main colors were red blue green gold black and yellow.citation needed Paintings showing scenes of hunting and fishing can have lively closeup landscape backgrounds of reeds and water but in general Egyptian painting did not develop a sense of depth and neither landscapes nor a sense of visual perspective are found the figures rather varying in size with their importance rather than their location.citation needed Block from a relief depicting a battle 14271400 BC painted sandstone height 
61.5  cm 
24.2  in Metropolitan Museum of Art US Fresco which depicts Nebamun hunting birds 1350 BC paint on plaster 98  83 cm 3 ft 
2.5  in  2 ft 
8.7  in British Museum London Fresco which depicts the pool in Nebamuns estate garden c. 1350 BC painted plaster height 64 cm British Museum Frescos in the Tomb of Nefertari in which appear Khepri sitting on a very colourful squareshaped throne Wall painting from Tutankhamuns tomb depicting Ay performing the Opening of the Mouth ceremony Scene from the tomb of Tutankhamun in which appears Osiris Picture of the wall painting from the tomb of Sennedjem in which Anubis attends the mummy of the deceased The Book of the Dead of Hunefer c. 1275 BC ink and pigments on papyrus 45  
90.5  cm British Museum London Architectureedit Main article Ancient Egyptian architecture Further information Egyptian pyramids and Egyptian temple Winged sun on a cavetto from the Medinet Habu temple complex. The winged sun represents a form of the falcon god Horus son of Isis triumphant over his enemies. The image was also a common protective device over temple entrances. Winged disks are a popular motif in Egyptian Revival architecture and art108 Ancient Egyptian architects used sundried and kilnbaked bricks fine sandstone limestone and granite. Architects carefully planned all their work. The stones had to fit precisely together since no mud or mortar was used. When creating the pyramids it is unknown how the workers or stones reached the top of them as no records were kept of their construction. When the top of the structure was completed the artists decorated from the top down removing ramp sand as they went down. Exterior walls of structures like the pyramids contained only a few small openings. Hieroglyphic and pictorial carvings in brilliant colors were abundantly used to decorate Egyptian structures including many motifs like the scarab sacred beetle the solar disk and the vulture. They described the changes the Pharaoh would go through to become a god.109 As early as 2600 BC the architect Imhotep made use of stone columns whose surface was carved to reflect the organic form of bundled reeds like papyrus lotus and palm in later Egyptian architecture faceted cylinders were also common. Their form is thought to derive from archaic reedbuilt shrines. Carved from stone the columns were highly decorated with carved and painted hieroglyphs texts ritual imagery and natural motifs. One of the most important types are the papyriform columns. The origin of these columns goes back to the 
5 th Dynasty. They are composed of lotus papyrus stems which are drawn together into a bundle decorated with bands the capital instead of opening out into the shape of a bellflower swells out and then narrows again like a flower in bud. The base which tapers to take the shape of a halfsphere like the stem of the lotus has a continuously recurring decoration of stipules. At the Luxor Temple the columns are reminiscent of papyrus bundles perhaps symbolic of the marsh from which the ancient Egyptians believed the creation of the world to have unfolded. Pair of obelisks of Nebsen 23232100 BC limestone the one from left height 
52.7  cm the one from right height 
51.1  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Model of a house 17501700 BC pottery 27 x 27 x 17 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Ceiling painting from the palace of Amenhotep III circa 13901353 BC dried mud mud plaster and paint Gesso 140 x 140 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Window grill from a palace of Ramesses III 11841153 BC painted sandstone height 1
03.5  cm width 1
02.9  cm depth 
14.6  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Column with Hathoremblem capital and names of Nectanebo I on the shaft 380362 BC limestone height 102 cm width 
34.3  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art The Temple of Dendur completed by 10 BC aeolian sandstone temple proper height 
6.4  m width 
6.4  m length 
12.5  m Metropolitan Museum of Art A view of the pyramids at Giza. From left to right the three largest are the Pyramid of Menkaure the Pyramid of Khafre and the Great Pyramid of Khufu The well preserved Temple of Isis from Philae Egypt is an example of Egyptian architecture and architectural sculpture The Great Temple of Ramesses II from Abu Simbel founded in circa 1264 BC in the Aswan Governorate Egypt Relief from the Dendera Temple complex Egypt Illustrations of various types of capitals drawn by the Egyptologist Karl Richard Lepsius Illustrations with two types of columns from the hall of the Ramses II Temple drawn in 1849 Jewelryedit See also Pectoral Ancient Egypt Usekh collar Ancient Egyptian flint jewelry and Egyptian Finger and Toe stalls Various beads from the Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City The ancient Egyptians exhibited a love of ornament and personal decoration from earliest Predynastic times. Badarian burials often contained strings of beads made from glazed steatite shell and ivory. Jewelry in gold silver copper and faience is also attested in the early Predynastic period more varied materials were introduced in the centuries preceding the 
1 st Dynasty. By the Old Kingdom the combination of carnelian turquoise and lapis lazuli had been established for royal jewelry and this was to become standard in the Middle Kingdom. Less sophisticated pieces might use bone motherofpearl or cowrie shells. The particular choice of materials depended upon practical aesthetical and symbolic considerations. Some types of jewelry remained perennially popular while others went in and out of fashion. In the first category were bead necklaces bracelets armlets and girdles. Bead aprons are first attested in the 
1 st Dynasty while usekh broad collars became a standard type from the early Old Kingdom. In the Middle Kingdom they had fallen from favor to be replaced by fingerrings and ear ornaments rings and plugs. New Kingdom jewelry is generally more elaborate and garish than that of earlier periods and was influenced by styles from the Ancient Greece and the Levant. Many fine examples were found in the tomb of Tutankhamun. Jewelry both royal and private was replete with religious symbolism. It was also used to display the wealth and rank of the wearer. Royal jewels were always the most elaborate as exemplified by the pieces found at Dahshur and Lahun made for princesses of the 
18 th Dynasty favored courtiers were rewarded with the gold of honor as a sign of royal favor. The techniques of jewelrymaking can be reconstructed from surviving artifacts and from tomb decoration. A jewelers workshop is shown in the tomb of Mereruka several New Kingdom tombs at Thebes contain similar scenes.110 Broad collar of Wah 19811975 BC faience and linen thread height 
34.5  cm width 39 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Pectoral and necklace of Princess Sithathoriunet 18871813 BC gold carnelian lapis lazuli turquoise garnet  feldspar height of the pectoral 
4.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Broad collar of Senebtisi 18501775 BC faience gold carnelian and turquoise outside diameter 25 cm maxim width 
7.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Pectoral chest jewellery of Tutankhamun 13361327 BC Reign of Tutankhamun gold silver and meteoric glass height 
14.9  cm Egyptian Museum Cairo Pectoral of Horus with sundisk circa 1325 BC gold with gemstones width 
12.6  cm Egyptian Museum Cairo Signet ring 664525 BC gold diameter 3 cm length 
3.4  cm bezel British Museum London 1849 illustrations of the Ferlini Treasures discovered in 1830 by the Italian explorer Giuseppe Ferlini in the New York Public Library Illustration of jewelry from the tomb of princess Merit Amuletsedit Main article List of ancient Egyptian statuary with amulet necklaces An amulet is a small charm worn to afford its owner magical protection or to convey certain qualities for example a lion amulet might convey strength or a setsquare amulet might convey rectitude. Attested from the Badarian period onward amulets were produced both for the living and the dead. Particular amulets were placed at specific places in the mummy wrappings. The heart scarab was a specialized form of amulet to protect the heart of the deceased in the afterlife. Amulets were made from a wide variety of materials including faience glass and precious stones  with color often playing an important symbolic role  and in a wide variety of forms. They might depict sacred objects such as the Djed pillar Tyet girdle or Wedjad eye animals bulls head amulets were particularly common in the late Predynastic period or hieroglyphs for example Ankh or Sa. From the New Kingdom onward deities  especially household deities such as Bes and Taweret  were popular subjects for amulets.111 Amulet in the form of Heryshaf seated on a lotus 1069332 BC gold height 
11.5  cm width 
3.4  cm Louvre Amulet that depicts Thoth as a baboon holding the Eye of Horus 664332 BC Egyptian faience with light green glaze height 
3.9  cm width 
2.4  cm depth 
2.5  cm Walters Art Museum Baltimore US Amulet which depicts a triad of Isis Horus and Nephthys 664332 BC faience height 
4.5  cm width 3 cm depth 
2.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Amulet depicting Taweret 664332 BC faience height 
9.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Scarabshaped amuletsedit Main article Scarab artifact The protective amulet for the heart was in the form of the scarab beetle the manifestation of the creator and solar deity Khepri. It was a symbol of new life and resurrection. The scarab beetle was seen to push a ball of dung along the ground and from this came the idea of the beetle rolling the sun across the sky. Subsequently the young beetles were observed to hatch from their eggs inside the ball hence the idea of creation life springs forth from primordial mud. The heart scarab was a large scarab amulet which was wrapped in the mummy bandaging over the deceaseds heart. It was made from a range of green and darkcolored materials including faience glass glazed steatite schist feldspar hematite and obsidian.112 Black was also associated with the afterlife while blue and green were associated with the birth and the lifegiving waters of the Nile. Heart scarab of the singer of Amun Iakai 15501186 BC glass length 
4.8  cm width 
3.5  cm height 
1.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City The back of a heart scarab of the singer of Amun Iakai 15501186 BC glass length 
4.8  cm width 
3.5  cm height 
1.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Commemorative scarab of Amenhotep III recording a lion hunt 13901352 BC blueglazed steatite length 8 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art The back of a commemorative scarab of Amenhotep III recording a lion hunt 13901352 BC blue glazed steatite length 8 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Potteryedit This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources in this section. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. February 2019 Learn how and when to remove this message Main article Ancient Egyptian pottery See also Funerary cone Different types of pottery items were deposited in tombs of the dead. Some such pottery items represented interior parts of the body such as the lungs the liver and smaller intestines which were removed before embalming. A large number of smaller objects in enamel pottery were also deposited with the dead. It was customary for the tomb walls to be crafted with cones of pottery about 15 to 25 cm 6 to 10 in tall on which were engraved or impressed legends relating to the dead occupants of the tombs. These cones usually contained the names of the deceased their titles offices which they held and some expressions appropriate to funeral purposes. Bluepainted jar from Malqata 13901353 BC painted pottery height 69 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Hathorshaped jar 13901353 BC painted pottery height 
24.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Cup ornated with papyrus flowers 653640 BC terracotta Louvre Goblet ornated with uraeuses 653640 BC terracotta Louvre Calligraphyedit This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. April 2019 Learn how and when to remove this message Main article Egyptian hieroglyphs Egyptian writing remained a remarkably conservative system and the preserve of a tiny literate minority while the spoken language underwent considerable change. Egyptian stelas are decorated with finely carved hieroglyphs. The use of hieroglyphic writing arose from protoliterate symbol systems in the Early Bronze Age around the 
32 nd century BC Naqada III with the first decipherable sentence written in the Egyptian language dating to the Second Dynasty 
28 th century BC. Egyptian hieroglyphs developed into a mature writing system used for monumental inscription in the classical language of the Middle Kingdom period during this period the system made use of about 900 distinct signs. The use of this writing system continued through the New Kingdom and Late Period and on into the Persian and Ptolemaic periods. Late use of hieroglyphics are found in the Roman period extending into the 
4 th century AD. Relief with hieroglyphs from the Edfu Temple Edfu Egypt Hieroglyphs on the Stele Minnakht from c. 1321 BC in the Louvre Detail from the side of a sarcophagus circa 530 BC in the British Museum London Hieroglyphs from the tomb of Seti I Furnitureedit Illustrations of four royal chairs with their supporters Although by modern standards ancient Egyptian houses would have been very sparsely furnished woodworking and cabinetmaking were highly developed crafts. All the main types of furniture are attested either as surviving examples or in tomb decoration. Chairs were only for the wealthy most people would have used low stools. Beds consisted of a wooden frame with matting or leather webbing to provide support the most elaborate beds also had a canopy hung with netting to provide extra privacy and protection from insects. The feet of chairs stools and beds were often modeled to resemble bull hooves or in later periods lion feet or duck heads. Wooden furniture was often coated with a layer of plaster and painted. Royal furniture was more elaborate making use of inlays veneers and marquetry. Funerary objects from the tomb of Tutankhamun include tables boxes and chests a gilded throne and ritual beds shaped like elongated hippos and cattle. The burial equipment of Hetepheres included a set of travelling furniture light and easy to dismantle. Such furniture must have been used on military campaigns and other royal journeys.113 Egyptian furniture has highly influenced the development of GrecoRoman furniture. It also was one of the principal sources of inspiration of a style known as Empire.114 The main motifs used are palm and lotus leaves flowers lion heads and claws bull hooves bird heads and geometric combinations. Everything is sober and with a monumental character.115 Furniture leg in shape of bulls leg 29602770 BC hippopotamus ivory height 17 cm width 
3.4  cm depth 
5.8  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Stool with woven seat 19911450 BC wood  reed height 13 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Inlaid box for cosmetic vessels of Sithathoryunet 18871813 BC ebony inlaid with ivory and red wood restored and gold trim height 
25.2  cm length 
36.4  cm depth 
25.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Headrest 15391190 BC wood 
17.8  x 
28.6  x 
7.6  cm Brooklyn Museum New York City Chair of Hatnefer 14921473 BC boxwood cypress ebony  linen cord height 53 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Chair of Reniseneb 1450 BC wood ebony  ivory height 
86.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art The Throne of Tutankhamun 13361327 BC wood covered with sheets of gold silver semiprecious and other stones faience glass and bronze height 1 m Egyptian Museum Cairo Armchair of Tutankhamun 13361326 BC wood ebony ivory and gold leaf height 71 cm Exposition of Tutankhamun Treasure in Paris 2019 Clothingedit Main article Clothing in ancient Egypt Artistic representations supplemented by surviving garments are the main sources of evidence for ancient Egyptian fashion. The two sources are not always in agreement however and it seems that representations were more concerned with highlighting certain attributes of the person depicted than with accurately recordings their true appearance. For example women were often shown with restrictive tightfitting dresses perhaps to emphasize their figures. As in most societies fashions in Egypt changed over time different clothes were worn in different seasons of the year and by different sections of society. Particular officeholders especially priests and the king had their own special garments. For the general population clothing was simple predominantly of linen and probably white or offwhite in color. It would have shown the dirt easily and professional launderers are known to have been attached to the New Kingdom workmens village at Deir elMedina. Men would have worn a simple loincloth or short kilt known as shendyt supplemented in winter by a heavier tunic. Highstatus individuals could express their status through their clothing and were more susceptible to changes in fashion. Longer more voluminous clothing made an appearance in the Middle Kingdom flowing elaborately pleated diaphanous robes for men and women were particularly popular in the late 
18 th Dynasty and the Ramesside period. Decorated textiles also became more common in the New Kingdom. In all periods womens dresses may have been enhanced by colorful bead netting worn over the top. In the Roman Period Egypt became known for the manufacture of fine clothing. Coiled sewn sandals or sandals of leather are the most commonly attested types of footwear. Examples of these together with linen shirts and other clothing were discovered in the tomb of Tutankhamun.116 Pair of sandals 13901352 BC grass reed and papyrus Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Illustration from the book Ancient Egyptian Assyrian and Persian costumes and decorations Illustration of a goddess from Ancient Egyptian Assyrian and Persian costumes and decorations Statue of Tjahapimu wearing a shendyt Metropolitan Museum of Art Cosmeticsedit Main article Beauty and cosmetics in ancient Egypt Use of makeup especially around the eyes was a characteristic feature of ancient Egyptian culture from Predynastic times. Black kohl eyepaint was applied to protect the eyes as well as for aesthetic reasons. It was usually made of galena giving a silveryblack color during the Old Kingdom green eyepaint was also used made from malachite. Egyptian women painted their lips and cheeks using rouge made from red ochre. Henna was applied as a dye for hair fingernails and toenails and perhaps also nipples. Creams and unguents to condition the skin were popular and were made from various plant extracts.117 Cosmetic Box of the Royal Butler Kemeni 18141805 BC cedar with ebony ivory veneer and silver mounting height 
20.3  cm 8 in Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Cosmetic dish in the shape of a tilapia fish 14791425 BC glazed steatite 
8.6   
18.1  cm 
3.4   
7.1  in Metropolitan Museum of Art Cosmetic box in the shape of an Egyptian composite capital its cap being in the left side 664300 BC glassy faience 
8.5   9 cm 
3.4   
3.5  in Metropolitan Museum of Art Perfume vase in shape of an amphoriskos 664630 BC glass 8  4 cm 
3.1   
1.5  in Metropolitan Museum of Art An 
18 th Dynasty ancient Egyptian kohl container inscribed for Queen Tiye 14101372 BC Musicedit Main article Music of Egypt On secular and religious occasions music played an important part in celebrations. Musicians playing instruments such as the castanets and flute are depicted on objects from the Predynastic Period. A wide range of percussions wind and string instruments were known to the ancient Egyptian. They include rattles clappers drums tambourines and the sistrum pipes flutes and trumpets and harps particularly popular at feasts. The lyre and lute were introduced from the Levant. Musical notation is not attested until the early Ptolemaic Period. Groups of musicians either mixed gender or female only are known from the Old Kingdom. Women singers and sistrumplayers had an important role in temple cults especially those of Hathor and Isis. Tomb decoration from all periods indicates that as today groups of workers sang to generate a sense of solidarity and to maintain their enthusiasm.118 A blind harpist from a mural of the 
15 th century BC Arched Harp shoulder harp 13901295 BC wood length of sound box 36 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Head of Hathor from a clapper 1295664 BC possibly boxwood 12  
6.2  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Detail of a frieze from TT52 in which are depicted three musicians Illustration of a harper playing in front of god Shu Sistrumedit Main article Sistrum A sistrum plural sistra is a rattle used in religious ceremonies especially temple rituals and usually played by women. Called a seshsehet in Egyptian the name imitates the swishing sound the small metal disks made when the instrument was shaken. It was closely associated with Hathor in her role as lady of music and the handle was often decorated with a Hathor head. Two kinds of sistrum are attested naosshaped and hoopshaped the latter became the more common.119 Sistrum decorated with a Hathor face 664332 BC faience length 
15.5  cm width 
6.4  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Sistrum inscribed with the name of Ptolemy I 305282 BC faience 
26.7   
7.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Sistrum with the face of the goddess Hathor depicted with cow ears 380250 BC bronze 
36.3  cm Walters Art Museum Baltimore US 
1 st
2 nd century AD bronze or copper alloy 
20.6   14 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Funerary artedit See also Funeraryart  AncientEgyptandNubia Coffinsedit Detail of the middle coffin of Tutankhamun 13551346 BC wood gold leaf semiprecious stones and inlaid glass 39  12  12 cm Egyptian Museum Cairo. The king is shown in the Osiride form with arms crossed over the chest and holding the crook and flail symbols of power and authority. The earliest purposebuilt funerary containers for bodies were simple rectangular wooden boxes attested in the 
1 st Dynasty. A coffin swiftly became an essential part of the burial equipment. Known euphemistically as the lord of life its primary function was to provide a home for the Ka and to protect the physical body from harm. In the 
4 th Dynasty the development of longer coffins allowed the body to be buried fully extended rather than curled up on its side in a foetal position. At the end of the Old Kingdom it became customary once more for the body to be laid on its side. The side of the coffin that faced east in the tomb was decorated with a pair of eyes so that the deceased could look out towards the rising sun with its promise of daily rebirth. Coffins also began to be decorated on the outside with bands of funerary texts while pictures of food and drink offerings were painted on the inside to provide a magical substitute for the real provisions placed in the tomb.citation needed In the First Intermediate Period decorated coffins became a substitute for tomb decoration in the Middle Kingdom coffin texts made their first appearance sometimes accompanied by detailed maps of the underworld. Middle Kingdom coffins show a number of distinct regional styles echoing the cultural fragmentation of the preceding period. In the 
17 th and early 
18 th Dynasties the Theban area produced characteristic anthropoid rishi feathered coffins. These were replaced except for kings by other styles of anthropoid coffins which became the standard form throughout the country for the remainder of Egyptian history. The predominance of decorated tombs in the New Kingdom removed the need of object friezes so coffins were generally undecorated on the inside. However this situation was reversed again in the Third Intermediate Period when new types of coffin decoration focused on the Osiris myth and extracts from the Book of the Dead to aid the resurrection of the deceased. In the Ptolemaic and Roman periods a cartonnage mask was often fixed directly onto the mummy wrappings as a substitute for a coffin.citation needed Coffins were generally made of wood those of highstatus individuals used fine quality imported cedar. From the Middle Kingdom onward wealthy individuals were often provided with a set of two or three nested coffins. The most sumptuous coffins might be inlaid with glass or precious stones while royal coffins were often made from gold or silver.120 Coffin of the estate manager Khnumhotep 19811802 BC painted wood ficus sycomorus height 
81.3  cm 32 in Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Coffin of Nesykhonsu c. 976 BC gessoed and painted sycamore fig overall 70 cm Cleveland Museum of Art Cleveland Ohio US Inner coffin of Amenemopet 975909 BC painted wood  gesso length 195 cm 77 in Metropolitan Museum of Art Coffin of Irtirutja 332250 BC plastered painted and gilded wood length 1
98.8  cm 
78.3  in Metropolitan Museum of Art Canopic jarsedit Main article Canopic jar Canopic jars are vessels which were used for storing the internal organs removed during mummification. These were named after the humanheaded jars that were worshiped as personifications of Kanops the helmsman of Menelaus in Greek mythology by the inhabitants of ancient Canopus. The practice of evisceration is first attested in the burial of Hetepheresclarification needed in the early 
4 th Dynasty. Her organs were stored in a travertine canopic chest divided into four compartments. Later each organ  the liver lungs stomach and intestines  was provided with a separate jar of stone or pottery and placed under the symbolic protection of one of the Four sons of Horus. During the First Intermediate Period the stoppers of canopic jars began to be modeled in the form of human heads. From the late 
18 th Dynasty they were more commonly modelled to resemble the heads of the protecting genii baboon jackal falcon and human. This became the standard for canopic equipment in the 
19 th Dynasty. In the Third Intermediate Period the mummified organs were generally returned to the body but wealthy burials could still include a dummy set of jars. The last known royal set of canopic jars were made of Apries. The manufacture of canopic equipment continued into the Ptolemaic Period but ceased by Roman times.121 Canopic jars of Ruiu 15041447 BC painted pottery Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Canopic jars of Tutankhamun 13331323 BC alabaster total height 
85.5  cm Egyptian Museum Cairo Complete set of canopic jars 900800 BC painted limestone Walters Art Museum Baltimore US Complete set of canopic jars decorated with hieroglyphics 744656 BC painted sycomore fig wood various heights British Museum London Masksedit Funerary masks have been used at all periods. Examples range from the gold masks of Tutankhamun and Psusennes I to the Roman mummy portraits from Hawara and the Fayum. Whether in a funerary or religious context the purpose of a mask was the same to transform the wearer from a mortal to a divine state.122 Mask of Sitdjehuti c. 1500 BC linen plaster gold and paint height 61 cm 24 in British Museum London Mask of Tjuyu c. 13871350 BC gold past of glass alabaster and other materials height 40 cm Egyptian Museum Cairo The Mask of Tutankhamun c. 1327 BC gold glass and semiprecious stones height 54 cm 21 in Egyptian Museum Mummy portrait of a young woman 100150 AD cedar wood encaustic painting and gold height 42 cm width 24 cm Louvre Ushabtiedit Main article Ushabti Ushabtis a.k.a. shawabti or shabti are funerary figurines. Their purpose was to act as a substitute for the deceased when he was called upon to perform agricultural work or corve labor in the afterlife. Ushabtis evolved in the Middle Kingdom from the servant statues included among grave goods. The earliest examples were crude statuettes in wax clay or wood later they were fashioned as mummiform figures and from the end of the 
12 th Dynasty they were customarily inscribed with the ushabti text chapter 6 of the Book of the dead which specifies the ushabtis duties.123 Shabti of Paser the vizier of Seti I and Ramesses II 12941213 BC faience height 15 cm width 
4.9  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City Shabti of Sennedjem 12791213 BC painted limestone height 27 cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Four ushabtis of Khabekhnet and their box 12791213 BC painted limestone height of the ushabtis 
16.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Ushabti 360343 BC ceramic and enamel 
26.7   
7.1  cm from Saqqara Museum of Art and History Geneva Switzerland Art of Meroedit See also Mero Ancient Egypt shared a long and complex history with the Nile Valley to the south the region called Nubia modern Sudan. Beginning with the Kerma culture and continuing with the Kingdom of Kush based at Napata and then Mero Nubian culture absorbed Egyptian influences at various times for both political and religious reasons. The result is a rich and complex visual culture. The artistic production of Mero reflects a range of influences. First it was an indigenous African culture with roots stretching back thousands of years. To this is added the fact that the wealth of Mero was based on trade with Egypt when it was ruled by the Ptolemaic dynasty 332330 BC and the Romans 30 BC  395 AD so Hellenistic and Roman objects and ideas were imported as well as Egyptian influences. Votive plaque of king Tanyidamani c. 100 BC siltstone 
18.5   
9.5  cm Walters Art Museum Baltimore US Votive plaque of king Tanyidamani c. 100 BC siltstone 
18.5   
9.5  cm Walters Art Museum Pot from Faras 300 BC  350 AD terracotta height 18 cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin Germany Beaker 300 BC  350 BAD terracotta height 
10.5  cm Egyptian Museum of Berlin Egyptian Revival artedit Main articles Egyptian Revival decorative arts and Egyptian Revival architecture See also Ancient Egypt in the Western imagination Foire du Caire building 1828 from Paris an early manifestation of Egyptian Revivalism faade adorned with heads of the Egyptian goddess Hathor Egyptian Revival art is a style in Western art mainly of the early nineteenth century in which Egyptian motifs were applied to a wide variety of decorative arts objects. It was underground in American decorative arts throughout the nineteenth century continuing into the 19
20 s. The major motifs of Egyptian art such as obelisks hieroglyphs the sphinx and pyramids were used in various artistic media including architecture furniture ceramics and silver. Egyptian motifs provided an exotic alternative to the more traditional styles of the day. Over the course of the nineteenth century American tastes evolved from a highly ornamented aesthetic to a simpler sparer sense of decoration the vocabulary of ancient Egyptian art would be interpreted and adapted in different ways depending on the standards and motivations of the time.124 Enthusiasm for the artistic style of Ancient Egypt is generally attributed to the excitement over Napoleons conquest of Egypt and in Britain to Admiral Nelsons defeat of Napoleon at the Battle of the Nile in 1798. Napoleon took a scientific expedition with him to Egypt. Publication of the expeditions work the Description de lgypte began in 1809 and came out in a series though 1826 inspiring everything from sofas with sphinxes for legs to tea sets painted with the pyramids. It was the popularity of the style that was new Egyptianizing works of art had appeared in scattered European settings from the time of the Renaissance. The Egyptian Revival portico of the Htel Beauharnais from Paris Coin cabinet by FranoisHonorGeorges JacobDesmalter 18091819 mahogany with silver 
90.2  x 
50.2  x 
37.5  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art New York City 1862 lithograph of the Aegyptischer Hof English Egyptian court from the Neues Museum Berlin Center table 18701875 rosewood walnut and marble 
79.4  x 1
19.4  x 
78.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Side chair and armchair 18701875 rosewood and prickly juniper veneer various dimensions Metropolitan Museum of Art Pitcher circa 1872 silver overall 
28.6  x 
15.6  x 
21.9  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Design for a costume of Princess Amnris by Henri de Montaut 1879 pencil and watercolor paint unknown dimensions in a temporary exhibition called Laventure Champollion at the Site FranoisMitterrand part of the Bibliothque nationale de France Paris Clock by Tiffany  Co. circa 1885 marble  bronze 46 x 
51.1  x 
19.7  cm Metropolitan Museum of Art Interior of the Temple maonnique des Amis philanthropes in Brussels Belgium an example of an Egyptian Revival interior The Supreme Constitutional Court of Egypt. See alsoedit History of art Ancient art Notesedit  It is disputed whether Cleopatra was deliberately depicted as a male or whether a stele made under her father with his portrait was later inscribed with an inscription for Cleopatra. On this and other uncertainties regarding this stele see Pfeiffer 2015 pp. 177181. Referencesedit  Redford 1992 p. 6.  Brace C. Loring Seguchi Noriko Quintyn Conrad B. Fox Sherry C. Nelson A. Russell Manolis Sotiris K. Qifeng Pan 2006. The questionable contribution of the Neolithic and the Bronze Age to European craniofacial form. Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America. 103 1 242247. Bibcode20
06 PNAS..103..2
42 B. doi
10.1 0
73 pnas.0509801102. PMC 1325007. PMID 16371462.  Genetic data Chicki L Nichols RA Barbujani G Beaumont MA 2002. Y genetic data support the Neolithic demic diffusion model. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA. 99 17 1100811013. Bibcode20
02 PNAS...99110
08 C. doi
10.1 0
73 pnas.162158799. PMC 123201. PMID 12167671. Estimating the Impact of Prehistoric Admixture on the Genome of Europeans Dupanloup et al. 2004. Mbe.oxfordjournals.org. Retrieved 1 May 2012. Semino O Magri C Benuzzi G et al. May 2004. Origin Diffusion and Differentiation of YChromosome Haplogroups E and J Inferences on the Neolithization of Europe and Later Migratory Events in the Mediterranean Area 2004. Am. J. Hum. Genet. 74 5 102334. doi
10.1 086386295. PMC 1181965. PMID 15069642. CavalliSforza 1997. Paleolithic and Neolithic lineages in the European mitochondrial gene pool. Am J Hum Genet. 61 1 24754. doi
10.1 0
16 S0002929707643031. PMC 1715849. PMID 9246011. Retrieved 1 May 2012. Chikhi 21 July 1998. Clines of nuclear DNA markers suggest a largely Neolithic ancestry of the European gene. PNAS. 95 15 90539058. Bibcode19
98 PNAS...
95.9 0
53 C. doi
10.1 0
73 pnas.
95.1 
5.9 053. PMC 21201. PMID 9671803.  Archaeological data Bar Yosef Ofer 1998. The Natufian Culture in the Levant Threshold to the Origins of Agriculture. Evolutionary Anthropology. 6 5 159177. doi
10.1 0
02 sici152065051998651
59 aidevan
43.0 .co27. S
2 CID 35814375. Zvelebil M. 1986. Hunters in Transition Mesolithic Societies and the Transition to Farming. Cambridge UK Cambridge University Press. pp. 515 167188. Bellwood P. 2005. First Farmers The Origins of Agricultural Societies. Malden MA Blackwell. Dokldal M. Broek J. 1961. Physical Anthropology in Czechoslovakia Recent Developments. Current Anthropology. 2 5 455477. doi
10.1 086200228. S
2 CID 161324951. Zvelebil M. 1989. On the transition to farming in Europe or what was spreading with the Neolithic a reply to Ammerman 1989. Antiquity. 63 239 379383. doi
10.1 0
17 S00035
98 X00076110. S
2 CID 162882505.  Diamond Jared 1999. Guns Germs and Steel. New York Norton Press. ISBN 0393317552.  Eiwanger Josef 1999. Merimde Benisalame. In Bard Kathryn A. ed.. Encyclopedia of the Archaeology of Ancient Egypt. LondonNew York. pp. 501505.cite book CS1 maint location missing publisher link  picture of the Merimde head in German. Auswaertigesamt.de. Archived from the original on 2 March 2012. Retrieved 1 May 2012.  a b c d e Shaw Ian ed. 2000. The Oxford History of Ancient Egypt. Oxford University Press. p. 479. ISBN 0198150342.  a b Gardiner Alan Egypt of the Pharaohs Oxford University Press 1964 p. 389.  a b c Gardiner Alan Egypt of the Pharaohs Oxford University Press 1964 p. 390.  a b Site officiel du muse du Louvre. cartelfr.louvre.fr.  Cooper Jerrol S. 1996. The Study of the Ancient Near East in the Twentyfirst Century The William Foxwell Albright Centennial Conference. Eisenbrauns. pp. 1014. ISBN 9780931464966.  a b c Redford 1992 p. 16.  Shaw Ian.  Nicholson Paul The Dictionary of Ancient Egypt London British Museum Press 1995 p. 109.  Redford 1992 p. 18.  Redford 1992 p. 17.  a b c Redford 1992 p. 22.  Redford 1992 p. 20.  Naqada III. Faiyum.com. Retrieved 1 May 2012.  Kinnaer Jacques. Early Dynastic Period PDF. The Ancient Egypt Site. Retrieved 4 April 2012.  Campbell Price 2018. Ancient Egypt  Pocket Museum. Thames  Hudson. p. 31. ISBN 9780500519844.  Old Kingdom of Egypt. World History Encyclopedia. Retrieved 20171204.  Statue of Menkaure with Hathor and Cynopolis. The Global Egyptian Museum.  David Rosalie 2002. Religion and Magic in Ancient Egypt. Penguin Books. p. 156  Robins 2008 p. 90.  Robins 2008 p. 109.  Guardian Figure. www.metmuseum.org. Metropolitan Museum of Art. Retrieved 9 February 2022.  Bard 2015 p. 188.  Van de Mieroop 2010 p. 131.  Kamrin Janice 2009. The Aamu of Shu in the Tomb of Khnumhotep II at Beni Hassan. Journal of Ancient Egyptian Interconnections. 1 3 2236. S
2 CID 199601200.  Curry Andrew 2018. The Rulers of Foreign Lands  Archaeology Magazine. www.archaeology.org.  a b c elShahawy 2005 p. 160.  Bietak 1999 p. 379.  Mller 2018 p. 212.  Bard 2015 p. 213.  Van de Mieroop 2021 pp. 151153.  Redford 1992 p. 122.  Candelora 2018 p. 54.  Sayce A. H. 1895. The Egypt of the Hebrews and Herodotos. Books on Demand. p. 17. ISBN 9783734739644.  Candelora Danielle. The Hyksos. www.arce.org. American Research Center in Egypt.  Roy 2011 pp. 291292.  The Rulers of Foreign Lands. Archaeology Magazine. A head from a statue of an official dating to the 
12 th or 
13 th Dynasty 18021640 B.C. sports the mushroomshaped hairstyle commonly worn by nonEgyptian immigrants from western Asia such as the Hyksos.  Potts Daniel T. 2012. A Companion to the Archaeology of the Ancient Near East. John Wiley  Sons. p. 841. ISBN 9781444360776.  Weigall Arthur E. P. Brome 2016. A History of the Pharaohs. Cambridge University Press. p. 188. ISBN 9781108082914.  Statue. The British Museum.  OConnor 2009 pp. 116117.  Wilkinson Toby 2013. Lives of the Ancient Egyptians. Thames and Hudson Limited. p. 96. ISBN 9780500771624.  Daressy 1906 pp. 115120.  a b Shaw Ian ed. 2000. The Oxford History of Ancient Egypt. Oxford University Press. p. 481. ISBN 9780198150343.  a b c d e Robin Gay 2008. The Art of Ancient Egypt. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press. pp. 127193.  a b c Aldred Cyril 1951. New Kingdom Art in Ancient Egypt during the Eighteenth Dynast. London Alec Tiranti.  Hawass Zahi A. Vannini Sandro 2009. The lost tombs of Thebes life in paradise. Thames  Hudson. p. 120. ISBN 9780500051597. The foreigners of the fourth register with long hairstyles and calflength fringed robes are labeled Chiefs of Retjenu the ancient name tor the Syrian region. Like the Nubians they come with animals in this case horses an elephant and a bear they also offer weapons and vessels most likely filled with precious substance.  Zakrzewski Sonia Shortland Andrew Rowland Joanne 2015. Science in the Study of Ancient Egypt. Routledge. p. 268. ISBN 9781317391951.  Hornung Erik 2001. Akhenaten and the Religion of Light. Cornell University Press. pp. 1930. ISBN 0801436583.  a b Fazzini Richard October 1973. ART from the Age of Akhenaten. Archaeological Institute of America. 26 4 298302  via JSTOR.  Williamson Jacqueline 2015. Alone before the God. Journal of the American Research Center in Egypt. 51 179192. doi
10.5 9
13 jarce.
51.2 015.a008  via JSTOR.  Brand Peter September 25 2010. Reuse and Restoration. UCLA Encyclopedia of Egyptology. 1 1  via Escholarship.  Aldred Cyril 1951. New Kingdom Art in Ancient Egypt. New Kindgom Alec Tiranti.  Egyptian Art in the Age of the Pyramids. Metropolitan Museum of Art. 1999. p. 20. ISBN 9780870999079.  a b c Leahy Anthony 1992. Royal Iconography and Dynastic Change 750525 BC The Blue and Cap Crowns. The Journal of Egyptian Archaeology. 78 239240. doi
10.2 3073822074. ISSN 03075133. JSTOR 3822074.  Leahy Anthony 1992. Royal Iconography and Dynastic Change 750525 BC The Blue and Cap Crowns. The Journal of Egyptian Archaeology. 78 238329. doi
10.2 3073822074. ISSN 03075133. JSTOR 3822074.  Robins 2008 p. 216.  a b c Taharqa et Hmen. Louvre Collections.  Razmjou Shahrokh 1954. Ars orientalis the arts of Islam and the East. Freer Gallery of Art. pp. 81101.  Manley Bill 2017. Egyptian Art. Thames  Hudson. p. 280. ISBN 9780500204283.  a b c d e Gay. Robins 1997. The art of ancient Egypt. Cambridge Mass. Harvard University Press. ISBN 0674046609.  The long skirt shown wrapped around this statues body and tucked in at the upper edge of the garment is typically Persian. The necklace called a torque is decorated with images of ibexes symbols in ancient Persia of agility and sexual prowess. The depiction of this official in Persian dress may have been a demonstration of loyalty to the new rulers. Egyptian Man in a Persian Costume. www.brooklynmuseum.org. Brooklyn Museum.  Smith 1991 pp. 206 208209.  a b Smith 1991 p. 210.  Smith 1991 p. 205.  Smith 1991 p. 206.  Smith 1991 p. 207.  Smith 1991 p. 209.  Smith 1991 p. 208.  Smith 1991 pp. 208209 210.  Tiradritti 2005 pp. 21 212.  Stadter Philip A. Van der Stockt L. 2002. Sage and Emperor Plutarch Greek Intellectuals and Roman Power in the Time of Trajan 98117 A.D.. Leuven University Press. p. 75. ISBN 9789058672391. Trajan was in fact quite active in Egypt. Separate scenes of Domitian and Trajan making offerings to the gods appear on reliefs on the propylon of the Temple of Hathor at Dendera. There are cartouches of Domitian and Trajan on the column shafts of the Temple of Knum at Esna and on the exterior a frieze text mentions Domitian Trajan and Hadrian  Berman Lawrence Freed Rita E. and Doxey Denise. Arts of Ancient Egypt. p.193. Museum of Fine Arts Boston. 2003. ISBN 0878466614  Campbell Price 2018. Ancient Egypt  Pocket Museum. Thames  Hudson. p. 266. ISBN 9780500519844.  Smith  Simpson 1998 p. 33.  Smith  Simpson 1998 pp. 1213 and note 17.  Smith  Simpson 1998 pp. 2124.  Smith  Simpson 1998 pp. 170178 192194.  Smith  Simpson 1998 pp. 102103 133134.  The Art of Ancient Egypt. A resource for educators PDF. New York The Metropolitan Museum of Art. p. 44. Retrieved July 7 2013.  Constantin Daniel 1980. Arta Egiptean i Civilizaiile Mediteraneene in Romanian. Bucharest Editura Meridiane. p. 54.  a b c Historical Atlas of Ancient Egypt Bill Manley 1996 p. 83  Color in Ancient Egypt. World History Encyclopedia. Retrieved 20181004.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 55.  a b Lacovara Peter Markowitz Yvonne J. 2001. Materials and Techniques in Egyptian Art. The Collectors Eye Masterpieces of Egyptian Art from the Thalassic Collection Ltd. Atlanta Michael C. Carlos Museum. pp. XXIIIXXVIII.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 78.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 92.  Wilkinson 2008 pp. 73  74.  Smith William 1999. The Art and Architecture of Ancient Egypt The Yale University Press Pelican History of Art. Yale Yale University Press. pp. 2324.  Wilkinson 2008 pp. 153  154.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 263.  Wilkinson 2008 pp. 134  135.  Smith  Simpson 1998 p. 2.  Smith  Simpson 1998 pp. 45 208209.  Smith  Simpson 1998 pp. 8990.  Sweeney Deborah 2004. Forever Young The Representation of Older and Ageing Women in Ancient Egyptian Art. Journal of the American Research Center in Egypt. 41 6784. doi
10.2 30720297188. JSTOR 20297188.  Fortenberry Diane 2017. THE ART MUSEUM. Phaidon. p. 15. ISBN 9780714875026.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 235.  Campbell Price 2018. Ancient Egypt  Pocket Museum. Thames  Hudson. p. 128. ISBN 9780500519844.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 197.  Grovefull citation needed  Mark Joshua J. 24 March 2016. Egyptian Book of the Dead. World History Encyclopedia. Retrieved 20190423.  Jones Denna 2014. Architecture The Whole History. Thames  Hudson. p. 31. ISBN 9780500291481.  Jenner Jan 2008. Ancient Civilizations. Toronto Scholastic.  Wilkinson 2008 pp. 119  120.  Wilkinson 2008 pp. 24  25.  Gahlin Lucia 2014. Egypt God Myths and Religion. Hermes House. p. 159.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 87.  Ecaterina Oproiu Tatiana Corvin 1975. Enciclopedia cminului in Romanian. Editura tiinific i enciclopedic. p. 17.  Graur Neaga 1970. Stiluri n arta decorativ in Romanian. Cerces. p. 16  17.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 53.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 57.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 161.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 230.  Wilkinson 2008 pp. 53 54  55.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 48.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 144.  Wilkinson 2008 p. 226.  Sara Ickow. Egyptian Revival. The Metropolitan Museum of Art. Sourcesedit Bard Kathryn A. 2015. An Introduction to the Archaeology of Ancient Egypt 
2 nd ed.. WileyBlackwell. ISBN 9780470673362. elShahawy Abeer 2005. The Egyptian Museum in Cairo A Walk Through the Alleys of Ancient Egypt. Farid Atiya Press. ISBN 9771721836. Bietak Manfred 1999. Hyksos. In Bard Kathryn A. ed.. Encyclopedia of the Archaeology of Ancient Egypt. Routledge. pp. 377379. ISBN 9781134665259. Evers Hans Gerhard Staat aus dem Stein  Denkmler Geschichte und Bedeutung der gyptischen Plastik whrend des Mittleren Reichs. 2 volumes Bruckmann Munich 1929 download at archiv.evers.frydrych.org. Mller Vera 2018. Chronological Concepts for the Second Intermediate Period and Their Implications for the Evaluation of Its Material Culture. In ForstnerMller Irene Moeller Nadine eds.. THE HYKSOS RULER KHYAN AND THE EARLY SECOND INTERMEDIATE PERIOD IN EGYPT PROBLEMS AND PRIORITIES OF CURRENT RESEARCH. Proceedings of the Workshop of the Austrian Archaeological Institute and the Oriental Institute of the University of Chicago Vienna July 4  5 2014. Holzhausen. pp. 199216. ISBN 9783902976833. von Beckerath Jrgen 1999. Handbuch der gyptischen Knigsnamen. von Zabern. ISBN 3805325916. Candelora Danielle 2018. Entangled in Orientalism How the Hyksos Became a Race. Journal of Egyptian History. 11 12 4572. doi
10.1 1631874166512340042. S
2 CID 216703371. Roy Jane 2011. The Politics of Trade Egypt and Lower Nubia in the 
4 th Millennium BC. Brill. ISBN 9789004196100. Pfeiffer Stefan 2015. Griechische und lateinische Inschriften zum Ptolemerreich und zur rmischen Provinz Aegyptus. Einfhrungen und Quellentexte zur gyptologie in German. Vol. 9. Mnster Lit. OConnor David 2009. Egypt the Levant and the Aegean From the Hyksos Period to the Rise of the New Kingdom. In Aruz Joan Benzel Kim Evans Jean M. eds.. Beyond Babylon  art trade and diplomacy in the second millennium B.C. Yale University Press. pp. 108122. ISBN 9780300141436. Daressy Georges 1906. Un poignard du temps des Rois Pasteurs. Annales du Service des Antiquits de lgypte. 7 115120. Redford Donald B. 1992. Egypt Canaan and Israel in Ancient Times. Princeton University Press. ISBN 9780691036069. Robins Gay 2008. The Art of Ancient Egypt. Harvard University Press. ISBN 9780674030657. Smith R.R.R. 1991. Hellenistic Sculpture a handbook. Thames  Hudson. ISBN 0500202494. Smith W. Stevenson Simpson William Kelly 1998. The Art and Architecture of Ancient Egypt. PenguinYale History of Art 
3 rd ed.. Yale University Press. ISBN 0300077475. Tiradritti Francesco 2005. The Return of Isis in Egypt Remarks on Some Statues of Isis and the Diffusion of Her Cult in the GraecoRoman World. In Hoffmann Adolf ed.. gyptische Kulte und ihre Heiligtmer im Osten des Rmischen Reiches. Internationales Kolloquium 
5.6 . September 2003 in Bergama Trkei. Ege Yaynlar. ISBN 9781555405496. Van de Mieroop Marc 2010. A History of Ancient Egypt. John Wiley  Sons. ISBN 9781405160704. Van de Mieroop Marc 2021. A History of Ancient Egypt. Second edition. WileyBlackwell. ISBN 9781119620877. Wilkinson Toby 2008. Dictionary of Ancient Egypt. Thames  Hudson. ISBN 9780500203965. Further readingedit Hill Marsha 2007. Gifts for the gods images from Egyptian temples. New York The Metropolitan Museum of Art. ISBN 9781588392312. External linksedit Wikimedia Commons has media related to Ancient Egyptian art. Ancient Egyptian Art  Aldokkan Senusret Collection A wellannotated introduction to the arts of Egypt v t e Ancient Egypt topics Glossary of artifacts Index Main topics Agriculture Architecture Revival Obelisks Pylon Art Portraiture Astronomy Chronology Cities List Clothing Ancient Egyptian race controversy Population history of Egypt Prehistoric Egypt Cuisine Dance Dynasties Funerary practices Geography Great Royal Wives List Hieroglyphs Cursive hieroglyphs History Language Demotic Hieratic Literature Mathematics Medicine Military Music Mythology People Pharaohs List Titulary Philosophy Pottery Religion Scribes Sites Capitals District Technology Trade EgyptMesopotamia relations Egyptology Egyptologists Museums Ancient Egypt portal Category Commons Outline WikiProject v t e Asian art Sovereign states Afghanistan Armenia Azerbaijan Bahrain Bangladesh Bhutan Brunei Burma Myanmar Cambodia China Cyprus East Timor TimorLeste Egypt Georgia India Indonesia Iran Iraq Israel Japan Jordan Kazakhstan North Korea South Korea Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Laos Lebanon Malaysia Maldives Mongolia Nepal Oman Pakistan Philippines Qatar Russia Saudi Arabia Singapore Sri Lanka Syria Tajikistan Thailand Turkey Turkmenistan United Arab Emirates Uzbekistan Vietnam Yemen States with limited recognition Abkhazia Northern Cyprus Palestine South Ossetia Taiwan Dependencies and other territories British Indian Ocean Territory Christmas Island Cocos Keeling Islands Hong Kong Macau Portals Ancient Egypt Arts Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleArtofancientEgyptoldid1220096413 Categories Art of ancient Egypt Egyptian art Hidden categories CS1 maint location missing publisher CS1 Germanlanguage sources de CS1 Romanianlanguage sources ro All articles with incomplete citations Articles with incomplete citations from December 2020 Articles with short description Short description matches Wikidata Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from July 2019 All articles with failed verification Articles with failed verification from August 2020 Articles with unsourced statements from December 2016 Articles with unsourced statements from November 2018 Articles needing additional references from February 2019 All articles needing additional references Articles needing additional references from April 2019 Articles with unsourced statements from July 2023 Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2023 Commons category link is on Wikidata Region topic template using suffix Articles containing video clips This page was last edited on 21 April 2024 at 1959 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width